Immediately, I decided I wanted to do something scientific or medical related instead, and being really into the TV show CSI at the time Forensic Science was appealing, but also Medicine as due to my families multiple medical problems I had been learning a lot about several medical conditions (cardiology and neurology mainly). Strange thing about this career choice was that I had ‘hated’ science at school, and I also had a problem of fainting at the sight of blood… Still, I enrolled on a Biology A Level course. Part way through the course I gained my first ‘real’ job which just happened to be as a Casework assistant for the Forensic Science Service (my dream job at the time…). I hadn’t been in the job 6 months before I went off ‘sick’ with stress and depression (It was actually a BPD crisis, but I was undiagnosed at this point). I left the job in the end due to pressures at home.
Sun on my skin warns me and, I'm told, produces vitamin D.
I’d buy all of the drinks at the infamous Muddy Charles Pub for a night to celebrate winning/stealing/inheriting/whatevering the one million in cold hard cash. I think I’d rent the whole damned place out. Yeah, that sounds swell.
To which I replied:
This afternoon I've got an appointment with the relaxation therapist. This time we will really get down to the actual work. I'm a little bit nervous about it. I do admit that. I don't know how well I will do this. I suppose I can be a total failure at it and learn it from scratch. I don't have to be perfect at it from the start.
O my God, in hearing your law read, do I not hear my condemnation? since I have not made it the rule of my life, nor preferred it before all things, as I ought to have done, but, on the contrary, have preferred my own will and the law of flesh and blood. I have not only omitted to do what it ordained, but have also done what it forbids. I know my faults exceed all pardon and mercy but yours, which is infinite, and which your goodness excites my heart to hope for, and my tongue to ask. For though your facility in pardoning be so great, yet in behooves me humbly to ask it; I will then make it the first of my many requests.
"Man, you look dreadful."
Things are good here, but busy. I'm enjoying the new job, and getting more used to it. I think it's something I'll be good at once I figure out how to do all 87 steps for writing insurance policies on the computer without stopping to ask someone what to do next. Customers don't really like it when you do that, just in case you were wondering. Back soon with hopefully more photos.
I haven't tried good old Wild Turkey 101 Rye in a while, so consider this a goodbye (for now) tribute.
1/2 teaspoon dried tarragon leaves
Making it in our local music industry is no easy chore.
That’s right, we’d bought out the supplier, and still no number 33.
Norvalts - Here be Vikings and their ilk.
Scripture could not be any clearer! The sad thing is that the more movies, cartoons and T.V shows are seen, the less valuable this very instruction becomes. How so? Simple, because of what is being delivered into the mind! Ideas, false principles, doctrines are formed in a person by and through everything they see. It may initially appear as “innocent information” presented just for the sake of the program (that is entertainment’s sake) but you have to ask yourself, “How much of such info directly influences a person’s way of thinking?”
Hey, it is also good experience for when we are famous and are invited to all those personal appearances and interviews.
It has been a bonus for JoJo, as he LOVES to watch all those machines working. (I bet he's wondering how he can get behind there and take them all apart.) I love this picture of him. He is such a sweetie.
1/2 tsp fine sea salt
My big worry is that when the reno's are done, the owner will up the rent. It's entirely possible. I mean, why else would an owner update a unit? Technically, the house is for sale. So maybe it's only for upping the sale value, but we will see. I don't think we can live here if the rent goes up. So maybe eventually we will have to find somewhere new too. But, I think I will worry about that when it comes. He's planning on doing these renovations over the next year. That's a lot of time. And God knows the future better than I, and He takes care of us.
PBS KIDS Sprout, the first 24-hour preschool destination available on TV, on demand and online for kids ages 2-5 and their parents and caregivers, will rule the kids television roost on Friday night, September 26 from 6:00 – 9:00 p.m. ET when it celebrates Chica the Chicken's birthday live from the Sunshine Barn. Adding to the egg-citement with several live performances throughout the evening will be The Dream Jam Band, a popular group from the Northeast who write and play original music for children of all ages.
You can read more about RISUG here, but in short it goes like this: injections are introduced into both vasa deferentia that partially block them and sort of deactivate the sperm as they pass through. Unlike a vasectomy where you “shoot blanks” so to speak, you still ejaculate sperm, but the sperm are all dead. Effectiveness is comparable to that of vasectomy, and lasts about 10 years, but it’s readily and easily reversible by a follow-up injection to flush the silicone or whatever it is out of the vasa deferentia. It also takes effect quicker than vasectomy (which can take up to three months), usually in about 72 hours. I kind of think of it as a “male IUD” if you will.
Josh Duhamel. Yum.
Now, if I wasn't entering it in a contest I would have painted it over in blue and called it a day. After four days of working on it I was pretty over this table. But I WAS entering it and I had to make it work.
The days were unbearably hot, then after a few days and nights of thunderstorms, it is cooler.
The extensive vodka selection at FireBird—from rare imports to unparalleled housemade infusions—is a backbone of the manor’s destination-worthy status. Unique selections include an array of house-infused vodkas, such as the favorite Honey-Infused Vodka, opaque and golden with a long finish reminiscent of sweet herb and spice. Or sample rare imports like the Kazakhstani “Snow Queen”, or elite, small-batch Beluga Gold from Russia—all served in eye-catching spiral-cut frozen glass flutes.
I value the opinions of those, like yourself, who challenge PC. I’m curious why some, like yourself, go to a certain point and stop. You seem intelligent and forthright on so many other issues. Why do you stoop to PC ad hominem when an otherwise rational discussion turns to criticism of Jews? Why do you distort and extremify the positions of those who, like myself, don’t give any special dispensation to Jews? Perhaps you’ll write about this. We need more open discussion of this problem that goes beyond calling people names.
Watch for that news here on NaturalNews.com. In addition, you may see me appearing on the Alex Jones Show (www.PrisonPlanet.tv) this coming week as InfoWars covers this issue as well. (www.InfoWars.com)
A land of trees that stand;
This post is illustrated with a photo of a man who survived a Lord’s Resistance Army machete attack and has the gashes on his head to prove it. You can read more about it courtesy of Human Rights Watch:
The most common reason for a no-contact provision is a domestic violence charge, however it can be placed on other similar charges.
OK, this is just plain old common sense, no political agendas for either side. Just common knowledge for citizens of a country, especially American citizens, who know every little tidbit about every other president (and their wives) that even know that Andrew Jackson's wife smoked a corn cob pipe and was accused of adultery, or that Lincoln never went to school or Kennedy wore a back brace or Truman played the piano.
Okay, I’ve said enough. Thanks for reading, if indeed anyone has, and I promise that, if you start chattering about the latest zombie-related property, I won’t say anything. I won’t even roll my eyes. I’ve said my piece, now. I’m done.
Last Wednesday Chad had all kinds of fun in store for us My County School District Employee Boot Campers. After warming up, we each got a sheet with at least ten different exercises on it, with 100 reps of each activity, divided up into ten reps each. The idea is to mix it up at a pace that works for each individual boot camper. Fun like push-ups, sit ups, jumping jacks, squats, lunges, bicep curls... you get the idea. There was also a line with ten laps on it, divided into ten. The laps were intended to be "rest" periods.
As I was finding last minute ideas to add to my lesson plans for teaching landforms, I was inspired by Reflections from Within's passports she created. So I created a passport for my kiddos (changed it up for my kindergartners!) so they are not only identifying and describing what they see in each landform, but they are thinking about how that landform will affect their way of life. I'm going ot have them think of 3 things they would need to pack with them... for example... if they go to the forest- they may need long pants, bug spray and boots. In the ocean, they would need a bodysuit, swimming goggles and flippers, etc. I love the idea of making them think this way!
When I think of her with a sidekick, I think of it only as a temporary arrangement. Relationships for expatriates tend to be short-lived. Other expatriates come and go, while local people--Thais in this case--have a host of family and other work-life responsibilities that are at often odds with the expatriate lifestyle. An expatriate doesn't make the same commitment to a place that an immigrant does, and Jayne is ethical enough not to set up false expectations or to allow anyone to become dependent on her.
So yes, I am in a house that is overwhelming full of things. And now that I finally, finally, FINALLY have the time and energy I will be tackling this space with enthusiasm. Yes, you read that right! I am so very happy to finally get the chance to do a real sort through and cleaning of this place. :) Expect amazing reports.... someday soon.
“A blue car,” she slurred before dropping her head against John, closing her eyes, and drifting back towards sleep. John allowed her to gently fall back to the comfort of the back seat and slid back out of the car, carefully closing the door as a few cars zoomed past.
Once chicken is fully breaded, heat 1 tbsp olive oil in non-stick skillet over medium heat, 2 minutes per side. Then add to a cookie sheet and allow to bake in oven for 5 to 10 minutes.
George Michael will start to sing "Looking for some education, made my way into the night"
we will be using the Cinco de Mayo holiday as a reason to get together at the box and throw some dead animals onto the fire pits (bring your own meat). I will take care of the beer, but in case you think there needs to be Tequila to celebrate this Mexican holiday, feel free to bring some. It would be great if all the talented Paleo Cooks would bring a sample of their favorite goodies… or bring something you never tried out before and see how everyone likes it.
Add one additional egg
For while we were still weak, at the right time Christ died for the ungodly. For one will scarcely die for a righteous person—though perhaps for a good person one would dare even to die—but God shows his love for us in that while we were still sinners, Christ died for us. Since, therefore, we have now been justified by his blood, much more shall we be saved by him from the wrath of God. For if while we were enemies we were reconciled to God by the death of his Son, much more, now that we are reconciled, shall we be saved by his life. More than that, we also rejoice in God through our Lord Jesus Christ, through whom we have now received reconciliation. (Romans 5:6-11 ESV)
A rigged marbles match, in which Lulu spins the ol' karma wheel, and wins, ends this installment.
be patient with myself,
Something that all of these publishers are organisations are doing is building a brand. Which is a novel concept to most publishers – who for years have been hostage to the brands of their author. The demands of the modern publisher mean that publishers have more opportunities than ever to build their own brand(s) and in doing so get much closer to their customers.
What did she find? Interestingly, all Wisconsin students had equal knowledge about negative racial stereotypes of Black Americans. This was equally true of students who, in other measures, admitted that they agreed or disagreed with the stereotypes. In other words, regardless of our stated attitudes, racial biases take up space in our brains, and as a result, could possibly influence our judgments of others. In particular, these racial biases are likely to influence our attitudes and behavior when we aren't consciously thinking about them.
We inked around the edge of each of the Start Ups charms with black StazOn ink and then set it with a Heat Tool. I ALWAYS have the kids print their initials and the date on the back of each of their projects, so they become a treasured keepsake.
Overnight the Asian markets were mostly lower losing 0.4%. Europe opened higher but closed -1.0%. US index futures were higher overnight, and at 8:30 weekly Jobless claims were reported higher: 386K vs 380K. The market opened flat at SPX 1385. It then dipped to 1382, and rallied to 1388, all in the first 15 minutes. As it started to pullback again; at 10:00 Existing homes sales were reported lower: 4.48 mln vs 4.59 mln, the Philly FED was reported lower: 8.5 vs 12.5, and Leading indicators were reported lower: +0.3% vs +0.7%. The market quickly sold off to SPX 1379 just past 10:00. Then just as suddenly the market rallied to SPX 1390 by 10:30. The volatility continued as the market started to head lower yet again. Around 1:00 the SPX took out the 1379 low for the day and continued lower. At 2:00 the FED released the following: http://www.federalreserve.gov/newsevents/press/bcreg/20120419a.htm. The market continued to decline until 2:30 when the SPX hit 1370. The market then tried to rally, hitting SPX 1379 just before a 1377 close.
1 catastrophic
That I wouldn't have a hope;
This is a quilt I'm working on for another pattern. I decided to make a pieced backing for it, just for fun. Now I have to work out how to quilt it!
on hills rolling like the pangs of loneliness,
Hope it Will make you smile and sign a “peace treaty”! I wish too you would give me the permission to make your letter public because it is beautiful even if hurtful on my behalf and that post.
2011 was a big year for social media. Not only did Facebook land 800 million monthly users, Google+ became the new kid on the block and my dad joined Twitter. But as more people glom on to social networks than ever before, businesses have also had to step up. These days, entrepreneurs and brands are constantly on the lookout for innovative ways to not just promote and market themselves and their companies but also become a valuable friend, fan and follower.
School. It plays a big part in the life of the Reeds. Between Aaron teaching full time, me teaching part-time and Bryn in school, I spend a lot of time working schedules around or thinking about things related to school. And anyone who knows me knows that I am more than a little obsessed with my kids' education. I probably spend far too much time fretting about/planning/overseeing things related to Bryn's schooling. Many days I worry that I am too involved. And then I worry that I am not involved enough. But most of all, I worry that I and/or the educational system is going to fail to provide what my daughter needs to live up to her full potential.
Is Tebow’s luck up this week? The QB and his team have struggled in recent weeks, limping into the playoffs by default after finishing the year on a three-game losing skid, including a 41-23 shellacking by the New England Patriots in Week 15. The Broncos’ opponent this week is the 12-4 Steelers (an atypical wild-card team), who boast the league’s top-ranked defense and a playmaking offense.
STOP THE MADNESS.
Ambience: 4/5
Sense the pain and whisper 'It will be OK, It's alright'.
And then the next week I spent all night wide awake in the same panic I did back in November, only this time staring at the phone for hours after your court time waiting to see if it was your number that rang or a random number I had never seen.
ahhhhhh .. can it get any better then spending time with family and friends?! - the people who adore you and the one's you adore back! - i am beyond thankful and blessed for the people who are in my life - i swear i hit the lotto big time with my group! *kisses* - casual lunches with my Mom, boating with my Dad, going to the beach with Joe, helping my Brother, playing with my Niece, drinking with the friends, gossip with the Bestie, shopping with my Shopping Partners, talkin' 'homie' with my Homies - exchanging thoughts with all those around me = pure heavenly bliss!
OK, So Rosie came up with one more VERY good idea on how to be a green & economic person:
It’s been 40 years since the first Earth Day.
I've been trying to get back into the swing of book things lately. Aside from carrying my notebooks and notecards around with me, I've been working with everyone's characters, trying to get a nudge in the right direction on something. It's been weird lately with writing, coming in spurts and such, but nothing really concrete.
Why are rents increasing? With the local Real Estate market hit with short sales and bank owned homes, many buyers are afraid to take the purchase plunge since buyers are unsure if we hit bottom. So instead of buying – they are renting. When demand for rentals rise above the supply of rental property – we see an increase in rents. It changes all the time. Real Estate is truly cyclical. As a Realtor – I can certainly say that Yes, on the SF peninsula we hit bottom in 2009/2010 for the single family homes market. Condos and Townhomes are on a different level – though they too will recover.
For one hundred bucks a pop, a man will sell the simple pleasure of being in his company, and the pleasure stops there: For a Benny Franklin, all you get is the right to occupy the same space as a man and a keepsake photo; conversation is extra.
TIP 2. Renaut also didn’t factor in the costs of installing a charging point. These used to be very procey but british Gas now provides then for £799, which means the electric van wins out again.
In the meantime, though, we are in trouble. America is a winner-take-all election system in which a party needs only 51 percent (or, in a three-way race, a plurality) in order to gain control.
There are some pretty mean-spirited fans of this game, and they infiltrate every fan base. The Vol Nation are not without them. And that faction of our own little football world will likely not forget that what they perceive, and they will not forgive Arian Foster for things that these people perceive as an affront to themselves. In the fourth quarter this afternoon, as Arian Foster salted away the Houston Texan’s first-ever NFL playoff victory with a 42-yard tight-roping tackle-busting touchdown run against the Cincinnati Bengals, I couldn’t help but think about his days as a Vol, when he was widely treated in a way that his detractors would not themselves like to be treated.
the innovative fleischmann brothers came up with the brilliant idea that yeast could be preserved in a dry state for much much longer storage than in its fresh state and over the next several decades, it became the standard. fresh yeast is virtually unavailable these days to the average consumer and difficult to find even in large cities.
-- While giving Mommy a spontaneous 'chest bump', Jonah stops and states to her, "Mommy, your chest bumps are bouncier."
Do the opposite of David Brent, and you'll be just fine when you give your next speech.
I'll be back with some more pictures of this class as well as the Valentine's Treat Class that's on the 7th. Fun stuff!
The Knights of Malta is a world organization with its threads weaving through business, banking, politics, the CIA, other intelligence organizations, P2, religion, education, law, military, think tanks, foundations, the United States Information Agency, the United Nations, and numerous other organizations. They are not the oldest but are one of the oldest branches of the Order of the Quest in existence. The world head of the Knights of Malta is elected for a life term, with the approval of the Pope. The Knights of Malta have their own Constitution and are sworn to work toward the establishment of a New World Order with the Pope at its head. Knights of Malta members are also powerful members of the CFR and the Trilateral Commission.
Up until about five minutes ago I would have avoided telling her the truth, fearful that I might hurt her feelings or confuse her.
We are with you… We care… Our hearts are strong for you… We are inspired by your courage and your strength, and your inevitable belief in your rights to live freely without domination or oppression. May peace and freedom be yours.
a) sexual harassment
Enjoy your flying days. I'm sure you will have a blast. Yes, singlehood suits the airline very very well. Do what you please, please who you choose. Enjoy life. Hurt no one. I hope you grow in the airline, and be someone you can be proud of. =)
Now, for your question. See, I’d be all for installing my own people to run puppet governments for me, and saving all the trouble that comes with giving the different city leaders the leeway to do things their way, but if you don’t do it right it’s more headaches than it’s worth. Biggest problem is it’s AWFULLY hard to keep control of a captive population if the people weren’t on board with the regime change. Like take Magatha Grimtotem trying to stage a coup in Thunder Bluff after Cairne died. How’d that work out for her? Yeah.
MR. PARKER AND THE GUN - MATTHEW MCBRIDE
Ricky said, "He needs to get his light fixed"
SUMMARY – PRECIPITATION:
To pray you open your whole self
Cut off the crusts of white bread slices. Place them in the food processor and pulse a few times to get the coarse crumbs. Transfer the crumbs into shallow bowl.
The first thing that jumps to mind when reading The Lifeboat is comparisons to Lord of the Flies. We see the 39 survivors of a disaster at sea floating around rather amiably to begin with. Grace, as the narrator, tells us about her companions and as the story proceeds things become rather heated between the survivors. Suddenly there are arguments and more tragedy builds leaving the reader asking questions of both the characters and themselves.
I took a seat, checking out the various wires and hubs underneath the table, being sure not to accidentally kick anything. Eli walked over and sat down opposite me.
Due process? Probable Cause? Screw that. Some US legislators are intent on being able to monitor all of your online activity, lurking in your internets like pedobear at a playground. The bill H.R. 3523, or Cyber Intelligence Sharing and Protection Act (CISPA), appears to be the next brewing threat to internet privacy and freedom.
JEWELLERY:
9. Let stand 15 minutes before serving.
because they do not recognize the voice of strangers.”
Article 108
If you've made sure to smooth out all puckers in advance your sleeve should turn out perfectly set and pucker free!
100ml cocoa
Part-time jobs for this week are:
Mahavishnu Orchestra – Visions of the Emerald Beyond
Well this post supposed to go live last Thursday 12/08/2011, but I never finished writing it. I just uploaded the pictures and saved it.
Prosecutors filed papers of intent to seek to have Anthony executed if she is convicted of first-degree murder, said Danielle Tavernier, a spokeswoman for the State Attorney’s Office in Orlando.
So on my way home from work today, I stopped by Target and bought this on a whim...
Here are some local branches of the NAACP:
I can only part with it for a good cause. Remember: the full proceeds of half of everything I sell goes to our church's youth group mission trip this June. The other half gets plowed back into the ground, in the form of art supplies.
For me, this foundation was nice and it offered pretty nice coverage, but it wasn't anything above and beyond for what my skin needs. If you don't have as many flaws as I do, you'll love the coverage level this foundation offers. If you do have more skin issues, this will even out your skintone and with building and concealer, you can get great coverage. You could also use it on top of other foundations to add and even coverage.
“Wow,” said Chris softly, “you’re a great friend, aren’t you? Someone we can all count on when we need you. Sure glad to know that when the going gets tough, Hank will point fingers and run away.”
So, back to blogging!!
Caroline's zen spirit is fully and completely evolving. Her conversations are open, honest, real and deep...to the bone. She shares herself in raw expose that carries with it a softness, a vulnerability that says "this is who I am, who I can be and I am enough." I adore this photograph.
Then there's poor, poor Tomorrowland.
Among those expected to participate in the march are hundreds of Catholic University students. University president John Garvey says “The passage of time since the adoption of Roe v. Wade has not dulled people’s sensitivity to this moral calamity. On the contrary, especially among young people, it has emerged as the preeminent human rights issue of our time.” If you said Fox News, you'd be dead wrong. It was MSNBC -- possibly the most liberal news outlet of the big four. Not what you'd expect from the "foaming-at-the-mouth lickspittle toadies of the Democratic party" as some would characterize them.
There's only one song worth singin'.
Predictibly you may add.
Frame border is Prima marketing stamp
alongbine: lmao you are so grotty. I’m going to tell her you said that! lol
The use of balance can also be seen on each page of the website. The pages are set up in a way that the text is on the left and either a picture (s) or video (s) are on the right side. Although the side with the pictures and videos is the side that is visually heavy, the flow and layout of the page is functional.
If you want to link to your own "Five Things for Friday" post you can use the tool below to add your link. 1) Please link to the URL of your blog post and not your main blog and 2) Please include a link back here.
The only downside right now is that Derek has the flu. But even that has an upside because work isn't that great for him right now so the flu (and associated doctor's certificate) is giving him a week on the couch to ponder, reflect, relax and rejuvenate.
A couple of these (Stone Arabia and Pulphead) are nominated for this year’s National Book Critics Circle Award. The reading is this March, to which I will happily drag CityBoy and afterwards enjoy a delicious dinner at Da Andrea (if I get my druthers).
From Janaye, a perfect stranger (and I mean that quite literally):
She could bring you to tears
Dust a little flour onto each piece of bread to stop them sticking and stack them up ready to cook.
I don’t know why I didn’t pay attention to this movie back in the 90’s. Might have been that I was getting fired right around its release. Then again, that might have caused me to miss a movie in ’91, ’99, ’04, etc. Regardless, (for those in Philly – “irregardless”) it was a fun story that featured dialogue almost as witty as When Harry Met Sally and almost as scenic as Dude, Where’s My Car? Add to that a fabulous shot of Abe Vigoda in a headdress and grass skirt, and you can’t lose.
Are there any songs with lyrics that just grab you? Songs that surprise you with the words they choose? Any musical artists that you turn to again and again for inspiration in your writing because they use words so fluently, so expertly?
Dance With You by The Black Lips
Valentine’s Day is a day on which people express love for other people. They send candies, flowers, personalized gifts, make dinner, go out, blah, blah, blah, etc. It’s usually pretty normal, kinda boring, and always the same stuff. Luckily, this world is filled with people who take life to the next level. Let’s start with the stupid, and then go to the really, really stupid.
for only one thing
Most recipes require us to coat the sides of the ramekins too but I find it too much of a hassle, because it’ll coat by itself later anyway. Here’s my half-hearted, faux-artistic attempt at coating the sides of the ramekin.
P.S.2. I hopefully will have a couple pix to post in the next couple days before I leave for my honeymoon!
Emma and Tristan, I honestly and sincerely think your love is the kind of love that generations whisper about and what best friend come lovers are made of, it is the kind of love that inspires your children and grandchildren to want, and it is the kind of love that people talk about for years, look at, and know without a sliver of doubt just how deep the roots of your love have planted within each of your hearts. I have this sweet image of you both, when you are old and grey, walking hand in hand, smiling at one another, and still in love. Truly. Madly. Deeply.
LAWYER: Oh. Yeah. Wow. Sorry. I'll never do that again....
Who knows the best way to explore space—the government or the market?
Eldest: Brunhilde – 37
My new year’s resolution is to start a newsy sort of blog sometime in the next month or so. It seems trendy. So again, stay tuned.
My skin is saggy, a little loose,
Canterbury is also home to two other ruins (besides the one at the cathedral). And if you’re a regular follower of Hammersmith Tales, you know how I feel about ruins. They set my heart a-flutter and my imagination a-flame.
Today there is no need to pray for the outpouring or the filling of the Holy Spirit. When we believe on the Lord Jesus Christ and by His grace become a child of God we are baptised by the Holy Spirit and indwelt by the Holy Spirit. The moment you became a Christian you received all of the Holy Spirit you will ever possess. You can allow this Holy Spirit to empower you and direct your life or you can stumble along and experience defeat in your Christian life. The choice is up to you.
You can take a beer into the theater whilst watching a film. Not bad eh. (I had a peep into the theater and it was ornate and beautiful). We enjoyed pizza and chips whilst supping on a nice and light McMenamins Golden Ale for not very much money as it was happy hour, and we sat people watching through the open doors of the bar. Nice.
Precious Savior, when the troubles of today come, help me to remember all You have saved me from in the past. Keep me faithful to trust You, for You are a faithful Deliverer!
Last night Max asked me if we could work on "Creative Writing".
Brooch: Thrifted
The State asked that it be set at R20 000. Chief Magistrate Desmond Nair, however, set bail at R100 000.
That was basically the conversations I was having to deal with at work today.
I have to go find some apparel from the 1970s for my daughter's project--at this stage, all I think I have left is some costume jewelry and a couple Bicentennial scarves. I wore snap-front denim jumper and a "Spirit of '76" scarf knotted around my throat for my junior high school photo. Maybe I'll give my daughter that!
Some strains CAN cause disease in the small intestine. They start by causing diarrhea and they release toxins that inflame the lining of the small intestine and the colon. There is a third strain and this is the one I hate (only because it's the one Colby had), it's called E.coli 0157:H7. It causes inflamed intestines, colon and bloody diarrhea.
“How much could it possibly be?”
You revived like the “phoenix” and so much alive
For South Africans who decide to do this, however, all the nonsense in the world is written about them and political propaganda takes over. ‘They’re taking the chicken-run to Perth’, ‘Toronto should be pronounced To-Runto’, ‘a loser is someone who moves to Perth’, and ‘an entrepreneur is a South African who moves to Bulawayo’.
Sokoiatopita
And nothin’ but the city all around us ever’-wheres!
Carefully place the coated jalapeno peppers into the oil. Fry them for just 2 or 3 minutes, turning them over half-way through. They should be golden brown. Remove them from the oil with a slotted spoon. Place on a paper-towel lined plate to drain. Sprinkle some salt on them while they are still hot.
Ranadivé sometimes tells potential clients he can do what they want him to do even before he knows whether it’s possible. It’s a ballsy way to win business, but it’s also a way to motivate his company to find solutions, which is what Tibco is supposed to do. This attitude has allowed Tibco to push into all corners of our culture.
Before I could answer Aunt Kathleen ran into the bathroom.
The stamps used are Tim Holtz Papillion and Indigo Blu Grand Tour 2.
The human trafficking unit has laid more than 80 criminal charges, including against Styles-Lyons, since its inception.
Intelligence had to be forwarded to Special Branch HQ at Castlereagh in Belfast and then disseminated from there – as deemed operationally necessary.
*watching the bunnies frolic in our back yard
Further, to the recent posts about my ordeal with The Metroploitan Police Counter Terrorism Unit I have been interviewed by two different officers from the CTU about imaginary links they tried to say I had with a terrorist. In the UK, the Counter Terrorism Command (CTC) are trying to build up a narrative of how the “far-right” are terrorists just like those in the Muslim community. I became ensnared in this effort because a man I never met liked a letter I wrote and posted on Facebook. This was decided on at a meeting between a senior Metropolitan Police officer and a meeting of Muslims.(1)
- L'Oréal day moisturizer for dry/sensible skin
Just saw, speaking of greatest, RESEVOIR DOGS. He doesn't connect the dots, you don't really know what happened, and it is full of bizarre and offensive dialogue. BRILLIANT. He seems to love the junk movies we watched when we were kids, kung fu, crime, action, horror etc, and he does them brilliantly....
Douse with olive oil, sprinkle generously with sea salt, and give a few grinds of the pepper mill.
one event that posted on FB attracted my attention - " Be Entrepenuer, not a dream", the resume of the speaker are impressive, he gained all sort of best speaker, best motivator in Asia..he is the founder of the so & so foundation, organisation... the best part is the course used to charge RM200, now only RM20. ok, I got into the tricks by signed up for the lesson, then the organiser asked me to pay for RM20 if I didnt turn up at last.
These boots are from Minnetonka and they are crazy comfy with laces up the front and fringe on the top. The tend to start up being by the knees and slip down during the day.
The report from the Congregation for the Doctrine of the Faith said the organization faced a “grave” doctrinal crisis, in which issues of “crucial importance” to the church, such as abortion and euthanasia, have been ignored. Vatican officials also castigated the group for making some public statements that “disagree with or challenge positions taken by the bishops,” who are the church’s authentic teachers of faith and morals.”
You know the one? You read a report in the paper about someone dying and one half of your brain thinks: Oh no, that's terrible, while the other half goes: What a moron.
It’s a journey filled with crowded border crossings where corruption rules; bumpy, unpaved roads that turn Alvarez into a “gasp-ometer, gasping every time we drop into a pothole”; moments of tension and fear where race, class and language seem insurmountable; and transcendent interludes where these barriers don’t factor at all.
-- NEVER GIVE UP -- NEVER GIVE IN --
When he went to open my parents’ bedroom door, I followed;
But children grow up as I’ve learned to my sorrow.
"Peeing."
This is one complete Unit. In good fiction, once you finish one MRU you do another, and then another, and then another… The point to remember is that first drafts are for getting the words on the paper, no matter how terrible. The real magic happens in the rewrites, so don’t worry about trying to make things perfect the first time around.
A little further down the highway that runs through this valley, there's a side road which leads to Goosenecks State Park. There, at an overlook, the San Juan River winds through a gorge with a view that's almost a mirror image of the beautiful and breathtaking road we'd just come down. We arrived late in the evening, in time to take a look before dusk settled in.
**END**
Cook the tortellini according to package directions. While the tortellini is cooking, place the bell peppers and green onions in the large bowl for tossing later. Drain them immediately in a colander, and rinse under cool running water. Drain well, and place in a large bowl with the peppers and green onions.
Spring is here! The growing season has started and our first CSA pickup was today. It’s a little earlier than last year due to our mild winter, and that makes me a happy girl. Kids eating fresh greens, scallions and radishes directly from our CSA bag. Fresh salads every night with tasty dressings. All our dressings are homemade, really easy and so delicious that the kids eat two, three and four servings of salad each night. The picture above shows a strawberry spinach salad with sweet poppyseed dressing that was inspired by a new restaurant in our area, Vge Cafe.
I've been trying to get another tutorial out for the quilt in the previous post ...... and have hit a snag. After doing a bit of digging, lo and behold .... there is a pattern available for this quilt and since I don't want to infringe on copyright .... there will be no further tutorials for this quilt from me.
How is this?
John W. Whitehead of The Rutherford Institute says: “At five times the size of the U.S. Capitol, the UDC will be a clearing house and a depository for every imaginable kind of information — whether innocent or not, private or public — including communications, transactions and the like. Anything and everything you’ve ever said or done, from the trivial to the damning — phone calls, Facebook posts, emails, bookstore and grocery store purchases, bank statements, commuter toll records, etc. — will be tracked, collected, catalogued and analyzed by the UDC’s supercomputers and teams of government agents. In this way, by sifting through the detritus of your once private life, the government will come to its own conclusion about who you are, where you fit in, and how best to deal with you should the need arise.”
The people kept coming, along with some costumes (dear person wearing the large Elmo head, I hope you didn't end up in the hospital), the large banners, and the lines to the port-o-johns. It's a good thing the waiting area is so nice, because you're there for a long time. Eventually, like cattle being herded into a chute, 20,000 of us dropped our stuff off in the buses that would be waiting at the finish line and filed into the road lined by metal barricades. That's where I saw my first spectators.
Avery loves throwing things. She gets in trouble for it pretty much every day now.
It was then easy to use hooks and suction hooks to create storage on the cot sides. I'd love to attach some small shelves for colouring books too.
1) Choose a minimum of 7 blogs that you find brilliant in content or design
RW: Please see attached, one of our key patent filings.
But Arnor the oaf was by when Gest said this, and ran at once to the Hawkdale booth, and told these words which had passed between Thorkel and Gest.
You would think that I might not be the only person with this question. You would think that information would be provided on the website describing the test or in the email confirmation I got after I signed up for test.
Jimmy Madison – Drums, Andy Newmark – Drums, Dave Tofani - Flute
The morning of that last day in Germany was half-spent retching over a toilet bowl, the other half spent sitting in a towel staring at BBC World News at some report about the Middle East, waiting for the gurgling of my belly to subside. When they did turn to rumbles of hunger, breakfast in the lobby was done, so I opted for the only choice food the room’s array of snacks had to offer – a small tub of salted Pringles.
"That's what's called a quick right cross with a left hook to the head, followed by a vicious right uppercut. As you can tell, it can also be quite painful."
Paul also was a Jew and fully knew the mind of the Jew, especially in the natural unsaved state. He wrote something of this in Romans 2:17.
· Claim that God is doing a “new thing”
He managed to play the song in squares in Amsterdam and Rotterdam (in the Netherlands), Bern (Switzerland), Rome (Italy), Vienna (Austria), Budapest (Hungary), Bratislava (Slovakia), Brno and Prague (Czech Republic), Warsaw and Krakow (Poland), Koln and Berlin (Germany). “I even got to sing my song in front of the European Commission headquarters in Brussels, where you’re not allowed to stop and sit. But I was fast. It only took three minutes,” he remembers.
As well you know, I love beer, and I am indeed a lady. So commercials like this one, well…they suck. And there are a number of reasons why. And I’m gonna list them.
to do the same.As we are liberated from our fear,
Off I go for now. It's bill paying time....my favorite time of the month. I guess I should be happy that I have the money to pay bills....but I'd rather use it for craft supplies, cause you know I have very few.
New goals met this month: 3
Pictures of the attack on the 33-year-old man by at least six policemen simultaneously, during a service delivery protest at Setsoto, in Ficksburg, eastern Free State, were shown on all SABC news bulletins last night.
This means war.
Or even worse,why would I be so so so damn scared every time Mrs. Merkel threatens me that she’s going to kick me out of the EZ.
I'm talking of retirement for white grey beards as young as 55...This has been reduced even more over the intervening period since 2005, to age 50 in the company I used to work for in ZA...
PFJKJ Blog (pfjkjblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
The Shelter will have a booth on site with dogs available for adoption.
Like candles, she swore, “No surrender,”
320k
Mom: Don't worry, I don't want to bother you, though I did receive news from the family back home. It can wait, I know you're busy and have no time to speak to me.
I reached for my axe, and placed it where I could grab it incase a hungry wolf decided to crash through the door on my ice shanty and try to eat me for dinner.
"Looking good" Diddy makes sure to appraise, even though they look like snooker players and are completely aesthetically wrongly arranged, the two much taller members, one of whom is singing lead, to the right with the two shortarses immediately to their right, meaning they're the ones in the middle. It looks about as just-wrong as the film, actually, as their moves aren't quite drilled into dead-on choreography and Russell Thompkins Jr, for it is he, looks like he's wearing false eyebrows to go with his tight perm and, perhaps not unconnctedly, more often than not looks startled. At least they're all standing up this time.
On the ride, I admired the trees and the countryside that it was nestled in. Then I pulled into the long driveway, and noted to myself that this wasn’t a traditional cookie cutter house, it would most certainly be considered a cottage. And then it was done, the decision was made. I was going to live in a cottage. This isn’t it, but I thought this was adorable!
5The rest of the children of Kohath by their families were given ten towns from the tribes of Ephraim and Dan and the half-tribe of Manasseh.
(Yea, okay – it’s 9 words. Sue me. LOL!)
geologists were quick to call for
Folks hanging out in the park applauded the free show of precisely-coordinated drumming.
The plan gives examples of transit-oriented development (Jamaica, Coney Island), where new investment would be welcomed. Underused areas, such as "portions of Atlantic Avenue in Brooklyn" (location unspecified), are ripe for development.
Level 4: MP Cost: 10, Attacks up to 4 enemies, Damage: 97%, Attacks the enemies 4 times.
3 Garlic cloves, peeled and minced
So now our little cute $30 laying hen has turned into a $1200 moving trip, provided we stay around what we want to spend for our new place - but it's not looking like it. Remember, I need a commercial kitchen. (Or at least commercial-able) That makes houses with land in my pricerange a tad scarce.
How fun does that sound?!? Yah, I was pretty excited. Turns out, that you had to have a group and a reservation. So I set out to emailing friends and family to get a group big enough to buy the minimum of $100 worth of apples. I got my group, and made our reservations, and we were ready to go.
Now keep in mind that all this time I've got 5 bajillion other things to do and am freaking busy as hell. But I think they're cool. They joke around. They're having a great time. Swell!
The agreement, broadly understood, codifies the ongoing conditions under which the US government agrees to operate in Afghanistan and will guide policies on the management of military bases, authority over detainees, the execution of night raids and other security operations, and will set conditions for troop levels and residual US forces that will remain in Afghanistan even after a ‘withdrawal’ commences in 2014. The agreement also deals with ongoing financial support for the Afghan government and military into the future.
So, keep running, and all your problems could fade away, or you could just find a better way to solve it.
It's way better...it's MORE paper racks! Do you know what that means?
He started by transferring his sketches. To the wall. They're huge. And amazing. And more than I every imagined they would be.
People love to chill at Outpost and they love the food (I do too) so expect to wait for your order and expect to be rewarded for the wait. Fortunately the atmosphere is socially mellow so you're bound to have someone to chat up (frequently a looker) while you strain to hear if your name's been announced.
The WebApp development is rapid on Groovy and Grails, with in few minutes the webapp will be
I wrote to Catherine almost a year ago, complimenting her blog. It’s pretty clear in that email that any emotional display was a no-no on my part; I admired Catherine for doing it so beautifully in her posts. I never thought I’d actually ever have anything to write about, but I guess meeting the person you know you want to spend the rest of your life with can change a lot of things.
Many of my UK-based readers will be wondering how this blog has managed to run for so long without featuring a single beer from Kent's famous Shepherd Neame brewery.
And, for the thousands of young Malaysians who braved Ambiga’s call for a sit-in protest over the slow pace of electoral reforms, it was their first baptism of fire and one that they can wear as a badge of honour.
There are no more than three climactic lines of action in the finale to follow (the attack on Endor, Luke’s battle with Vader and the Emperor, the assault on the Death Star II), with that much more to see levitate, move around, collapse and blow up. This of course gave Ralph McQuarrie, Ben Burtt, Richard Edlund, Joe Johnston, Dennis Muren and their assorted fellow effects crew members much to work with and the viewer much more to salivate over.
I had an episode of Diners, Drive-ins, and Dives on Food Network on last weekend as I did household chores, and Guy Fieri was at a Cuban place. I wasn’t able to see the entire clip but I did see some yummy looking ground beef, sofrito (there are variations of sofrito, but in Cuban cooking it’s diced green pepper, onion, and garlic), tomatoes, and green olives coming together in a heavenly looking, hearty meat sauce that was put on top of white rice. I later researched and found it was picadillo. Here’s the recipe I concocted based upon a number of recipes I found. I’ve learned that “authentic, just the way my grandma use to cook it” recipes can vary widely; hopefully I’ve captured the spirit of the dish with my amalgamation.
Red chilli - 1
all alone, or just unsightly,
It is about time to wrap up discussion on my Ireland trip, so this will be my final post focused on the subject. My “victories” in Ireland pale against coming to Christ, but the many things I was able to see and experience offered me a number of reasons to celebrate. As mentioned in a previous post, visiting Ireland has been a nearly lifelong dream, so just being there was pretty darn amazing. Beyond the landscapes, castles, and all the other things a person normally would expect to find there, some of the best things were not really anticipated.
March has come and March is, but all that I thought and hoped would come with it have not. Except for Spring that is!
….and to all others who follow the Souramana Calendar….. and celebrate the spring as the beginning of the new year!
7) Keep in touch with my friends.
The winner of the contest wins a $5,000 advance and a publishing contract. Sounds good, but the kicker is that the winner has to sign a standard publishing contract without any negotiations. I have heard such horror stories about the sneaky wording publishers use in those contracts, and how they can tie up your rights indefinitely even though they are no longer trying to sell your book. Is a standard publishing worth all the work it will take to win it? I don’t know.
The girls, aged 15 and 16, were driven from Telford, Shropshire, to the flat by two men who used them for sex before “offering them up to their friends”.
12. “When I first saw Taemin, I thought he was really pretty. At that time there was a trainee noona in front of him, and Taemin was even prettier than her.” (EUNHYUK)
190 ***2. “An Introduction to Hindu Thought: The Bhagavad Gita.” The Great Ideas Today, vol. 1985, pp. 258-85 (Encyclopedia Britannica, 1985). (Source: Item D-IV/12/1981, below. Incorporated in Item B-12, above, pp. 67-98 (2002)).
By an experience of the innocent self
We have only eaten one meal with the frozen meat, but so far have been very impressed. I usually rely on the Ziploc freezer bags, but they inevitably end up getting frosty and dry out the meat. This week our meal was perfect, mostly because our meat was so fresh.
But sitting here thinking about it, that isn't an answer really. It is the answer I am willing to get into with people who ask me why I hunt. The people who ask that question always ask with that smug tone of voice. Like I am a bad person for wanting to provide my own meat.
250ml milk
Ms. Tango Lizzie (looking elsewhere): I said no.
10. Take a Breath
Only a few people were present to witness Goo breathe his last. It is reported he chose as his last meal a hot roast beef sandwich with mashed potatoes and green beans. And a large slice of Red Velvet cake for dessert. He swallowed down a large beer, smiled and belched before in death he closed his lying eyes.
The next event for the Copart Finder, KC Auto, U Pull It and Top Signs supported team is the Bulldog International Rally of North Wales which takes place on Saturday 27 April. Utilising the world famous Sweet Lamb Rally complex and surrounding forests this, the MSA Dulux Trade British Rally Championship season opener, is sure to attract a large number of spectators.
I have often planned on mentioning some of these super-cute-omg-I-have-to-have-it items, but never feel like they justify a whole post on their own.
where they go.
plus progress on Game Board Sampler. I also made a
"Where do you think the term pissing match came from?"
If one is not a stickler for continuity, I can see how the film would be enjoyable. It can be both funny and horrifying at times. When society embraces Cornelius and Zira, they reciprocate hilariously. Zira models the latest fashions, joins the women’s liberation movement, and discovers a taste for alcohol. Cornelius makes an effort to become a bon vivant. It all comes unraveled when Zira accidentally reveals she used to dissect humans as part of her study. Under drugs (What, no waterboarding?) she reveals all. To our society, it sounds like Nazi war crimes of Josef Mengele. To Zira, it was animal research.
So how do I keep notes for story ideas without a notebook? I created a private blog and, since I'm at my Mac what seems like eighteen hours a day, it's easy to go over and post the idea, no matter how insignificant it may seem. We all know a seed can bloom into a great idea. If I'm away from the Mac I send a text to myself.
I'm selling a bunch of Pokemon cards. Why? Because my kids sneaked them into my shopping cart while at the grocery store and I ended up buying them because I didn't notice they were there until we got home. How could I have possibly not noticed they were in my cart, you ask? Let me explain.
issues with solution 1:
As if that’s not enough, there is electricity needed to run the treatment plants and the pumps and all that good stuff. Electricity that, in most areas, is still made by burning fossil fuels. Which create pollution. Which seeps into the water…..
Talking about lighting, I would love to introduce you today to the brand new webshop of my friend Natalie Haegeman of Natalie Haegeman Interiors.
Which actually raises the quite interesting possibility that an entire city could be built, zoned, and constructed to the precise heights and locations necessary to block all views of the cosmos. You'd never even know the stars existed. And this could happen accidentally, over time, with no one planning it or expecting it to happen; you take a new job, and move to a new city, and one night you go out for a walk only to realize, my god, you can't see a single fucking star...
I knew where all the fire hoses were, but was completely clueless on what I needed to do. The flame was 30 feet above the deck and what was around the stack didn't seem to be running down towards the equipment below. Now what? I had an idea: I'll use the big dry chemical extinguisher, but I soon tossed that idea, since the wind would only blow the dust away from the fire and make a mess. I thought some more. It seemed like minutes were passing, but it was only moments. I needed to do something now; there was no guarantee the fire wouldn't spread.
for the cinnamon dawn loves me better
And many of you have been with me the whole time. Reading, offering support by way of comments and e-mails, gifts and tokens of friendship. Kind words, most of all.
When I spotted this Urban Decay 24/7 Eyeshadow Pencil Stash in a local shop in our city centre I picked it up immediately.
Enlightenment and Peace, like balance, is something that doesn’t come once. It is something we learn and maintain as we go along. It is a practice. Aw snap! I thought I had gotten out of that whole daily spiritual practice thing. O well. I think I will go meditate now.
I know that I've left you hanging a bit on Joe's progress. I apologize for that, but I also know that those of you reading this understand to some extent the possible reasons...
At our Thurday meeting it was resolved that four members of committee, Wahinya Boore, John Maina Mwangi, Melissa Awero and Maina Chege would travel to Jeff's home and handover the cash collected officially to the custody of Jeff's parents and the local funeral committee. As this story broke, those individuals were already en route to Muranga County.
To keep – for those projects that have been deemed worthy of keeping file into the appropriate folder. We used one folder per kid per year. When this folder is full we made it a rule that we cannot keep anymore projects, unless the folder is purged and room is made for the new project.
everyone's feelings. big and small.
Makes about 5 cups
And reading so many fantastic writers.
Returned at 35 minutes. ~130 F.
Yippee! I am officially enrolled into some college classes!
Everything flows and nothing abides.
Are you recovering from the holidays? Not yet? Then you must be ready for some new visual stimulation, to get us through the winter months.
I was in the park the other day, and I picked up a large stick. Why I picked up a stick, or what forces took me to that particular stick, or what history put me into a position to be in that particular park at that time, I do not know. I tossed this stick into the air, and the forces of air-pressure, of gravity, and the like, pulled the stick back toward the ground, and it fell upon a small sapling. The question which came immediately to my mind concerns this stick upon this fledgling tree. Is my action of choosing to pick up that stick and throwing it, and the resulting consequence (the sapling being bent beneath a stick) the same, or is it different than, when the wind pulls a rotten branch from a higher part of a tree, and drops the stick upon this same sapling? Is it only natural if the stick arrives upon the sapling if the process is absent of volition?
I am bullied by the waiter into ordering desert as he reminds me it is included in the price and he smiles knowingly when I order ‘caramel pudding’ He obviously knows that it’s made entirely of powdered egg! He laughs when he collects my plate – not fooled by the napkin I have covered the remains of the pudding with. We wander back to the hotel for an earlyish night – the rain seems to have stopped but it’s bloody cold….I think of these smug bastards in Prague guzzling beer on the terrace in their shorts, and hope we improve our restaurant choice tomorrow.
The interpretation given to Mr Yates was that an offence could only be proved to have been committed where it could be proved, beyond reasonable doubt, that a message on a mobile phone had been accessed by a third party before the intended recipient had heard it. On the guidance Mr Yates stated he had been given, it was necessary to prove that messages were hacked before the recipient got to them. Understandably that would be something very difficult to prove.
So you tell me that you think I am courageous.
Now, there is an alternative to sewing darts in a bra cup. Instead, you can also gather the fabric between the darts and stitch in place. The gathers can be good if you're looking to add the illusion of more fullness to the bra cup. I did this with the Pauline sew-along, you can see how here.
But this is not a sweet, happy, fun love story. (And a good thing, too, or I probably would have hated it.) There's a dark, eerie undercurrent of secrets that slowly becomes clear to the reader, who then watches this realization dawn on Alan through a series of creepy psychic manifestations.
To the right is an activity I like to do each year. Each child is given Fruit Loops to create a pattern of choice. They glue them on then label their pattern by color, number and letter. They always like this activity because they get to each the leftover cereal!
Roger Phillips
All those scenes to this affair
2. I love to do the Chicken Dance and the Tooty-Ta songs with my students. That is when you can see me get really silly.
I never thought I would know the meaning of things like
Things started slowly as I tried to get my head around life outside of the civil service – what do you do with an ex-civil servant? (Especially one with a dragon fairy). History vs economics - a wingtip to the two subjects I have university-level qualifications in, was an observation on how today’s politicians seem to be devoid of presence, personality, calibre and competency to deal with the economic crises that we are going through. Too many of them seem to be anonymous when compared to the big historical figures of yesteryear.
BANKS AGAIN………
"I was surprised this time by what seemed to be missing, things like cell phones and computers which, of course, were not yet the ubiquitous items they are today."Fifty years earlier, cell phones were not what was ubiquitous then. Can you read what the men are saying in this advertising cartoon from 1957? That's only five years before A Wrinkle in Time was published in 1962.
To me, signing your life over to the military is a true act of leadership. It is more than just swearing to protect the United States of enemies, both foreign and domestic. They must go through physical and mental training, familial separation and even anthrax shots and gas chambers. They do all this to protect our country.
Raventos i Blanc is a true pioneer of Cava production (this family winery was making sparkling wine before the name Cava existed). Their new vintage rosado cava is phenomenal. Adding 15% Monastrell to the traditional cava blend of Macabeo, Parellada and Xarel-lo tints the wine with the palest pink hue. Fine bubbles lift the yeasty brioche aroma from the glass. The barest hint of strawberry flavor adds context to the dry, crisp, pinpoint precise style that Raventos i Blanc is known for.
I’ll go to Taekwondo to learn how to fight. My legs shall become steel bear-teeth, my arms, steel back scratchers, and my mind a steel trap. I will be able to kick the living shiz out of anyone I see. But only capitalists. In top hats. Their immense bulk will make for an easy victory, but their hired goons may prove a harder nut to suck, leading to my next point.
In her keynote address at the PKR congress, Wan Azizah said the notions of “ketuanan Melayu” (Malay supremacy) should be abandoned so that the younger generation would grow up with the vision of “dignified race” or “dignified Malay.”
As a young girl she lived in an old house that had been subdivided into apartments, and her parents believed the apartment they lived in was haunted. Pictures and items would be moved to different places when they came home; a cousin saw a man standing at the foot of her bed one night; and when the neighbor’s children would call at the door for Catherine and her sister to come out and play, a man’s voice would answer saying, “They aren’t home.” Funny thing was, no one was home when kids came calling … except the ghost.
Third, she watch the car crash, so she have to go police again!
As any cloth diapering blogging momma knows, giveaways are great opportunities to build your stash! Not only that, but great opportunities to find other like minded mommas and companies that offer all the products you love, and some you never knew you needed! After liking all these great pages on my Facebook, an article appeared. We all know the one, talking about the women in New York who were reusing disposables because they couldn't afford to purchase diapers. This immediately sent me on a journey. I want to start a non profit to bring cloth diapering education to low-income families. I was also struck with something my mom has always told me, "When it comes to your babies, you do everything you can. If you run out of wipes, use the sink and a rag. A towel soaks up pee just as good as a diaper." Those aren't her exact words but pretty similar. Ironic actually, because my mom really dislikes that we use cloth diapers. Any how, I wanted to use everything I have around the house that is not actually a cloth diaper, and write about it hear on my blog. But before I had the chance, I came across Kim's entry on Dirty Diaper Laundry - The Flats Challenge. A challenge to diaper with only flats (except at night) and hand wash them all for a week (the last week of May). I was sold. Even better - since I have no flat diapers - I was actually provided flat diapers through her via Diaper Junction!
is pretty tough, a friend of mine went through that. She doesn't
I saw. I conquered. Couldn’t come. –David Lodge
“The HP-designed system contains 288 Calxeda servers in a single 7 inch, four-rack unit chassis,” said Barry Evans, CEO and founder with Calxeda. “A single rack of HP’s Calxeda servers delivers the throughput of some 700 traditional servers and dramatically simplifies the infrastructure needed to hook them all together and manage the cluster.”
An offer of help, a word of encouragement: maybe even taking the child to the park whilst Mum has a break, or reading stories to the little one whilst she takes "five" - there are many small ways in which we can make a big difference. As Professor Fiona Stanley here in Perth said many years ago, "It takes a village to raise a child".
“Glory to God in the highest heaven, and on earth peace to those on whom his favor rests.”
1342 **D-III/19(B)/2000. “Ambition and Power in Shakespeare: On Sonnet 94.” Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2001(3), above, pp. 235-58.)
My bike, I took the walkway, carefully
Leaving aside the questionable justifications advanced by our negotiators for keeping secret the "deal" with the employers which has yet to be approved by Ministers (http://www.jonrogers1963.blogspot.com/2012/04/stop-press-eric-pickles-didnt-eat-my.html?m=1), I surely can't be the only one out here in the blogosphere wondering why we haven't at least set a deadline for the Government to respond, following which we would (at the very least) make public the proposals which have now been with civil servants for twelve weeks.
Some states require that the defendant’s behavior cause the victim actual fear (which usually requires
She: OK, let’s GO!!
www.teriscraftspot.blogspot.com
I thought.... I guess I could combine all of these into one and just make it kind of one random blog, separate from this 365 days to Live My Best Life blog, but all encompassing on anything else in the world I feel like getting off my chest, but really... who has the time for that. I'm hardly organized enough to remember my 2 different email accounts let alone manage 2 different blogs. Hell I haven't even figured out what I need to know about blogging yet anyway so I'm probably not the best person to start branching out.
Location: USFS
Hundreds of thousands of disabled benefit claimants in the WRAG have disabilities which will leave us unable to work over periods of years, if not decades. For most of us the reality is that a disability is for life, not just for Christmas, and there is no magical Medical Model fix to make it all go away with a wave of Lord Freud’s fairy wand, nor is DWP’s beloved Bio-Psycho-Social Model (aka the floggings will continue until you admit you’re better) going to make one jot of difference, unless it is to pressure people into damaging themselves further. No matter what Lord Freud may proclaim in the Lords in the next few days, I and other disabled people in the WRAG are not going to have a miracle cure at 12 months; to make my disability go away you would have to reprogramme the genetics of every cell in my body to correct the faulty connective tissue, and then fix all of the damage caused by nearly 50 years of those ligaments and tendons failing to protect joints, never mind the two distinct and individually disabling spinal injuries. What you see is what you get and that is someone who can't manage a job that involves sitting at a desk, standing or walking around. Find me a job I can do flat on my back (and I have problems even there) and there is a chance I can work, but how many jobs allow for that possibility? And each disabled person will come with their own individual set of limitations and issues.
Teaching my children to read was, I thought, the most important and the most daunting task I had as a new homeschooler. What if I failed miserably and my kids were in 5th grade and couldn't read and it was too late for the public schools to catch them up and it was all my fault??? Fortunately, my older three are reading well and my youngest is coming along fine, but over the years, I've tried a number of methods and products to get there. One of my very favorites is Reading Eggs at http://readingeggs.com/.
So who's in the Spotlight this week? Our challenge theme of "The One I Love" proved exceptionally popular and I was certainly kept busy visiting your blogs to look at all of the gorgeous entries. The variety of styles and interpretations never ceases to amaze me as I scout for Spotlight winners. I was seriously tempted by some of the shabby chic, multi-layered cards which were among this week's entries, but for me, well there was just something about this card that stood out...
John Travolta's Bubble Boy has nothing on Rowan for
BSS: "Because I'm stomping in place... again"
Duff’s Brooklyn
Place the new latch in the hole, and hold it in the right spot. Then trace around it:
So as always, it's back to research. At least nature's reliable, and I bet I'm not only one who’s spent hours on bird-watching sites recoiling from ear-splitting shrieks I’m told are vultures indigenous to the Crimea. Cities are more changeable, but ancient maps came to my rescue many times when writing ‘In the Name of the King’. I knew about the hubbub of sound that would have greeted my country boy hero when he entered Paris – the maps gave me churches and therefore bells, contemporary engravings gave me cobbles and carriages, banging shutters and the cries of water-vendors – but I wanted something familiar under it to root him and keep him calm. Only one old map included the mysterious word ‘Ponceau’ right by the site of the old Porte St-Denis, but that gave me just what I needed: the sound of running water.
Heezy Baby – Logobi Heezy International
Mr. Coleman: (Singing) They call me mellow yellow~
I have to admit I am a little chuffed with myself! I am even considering making some summer shorts for him to wear outside the safety of our house. For more Creative Spaces - head over here
*) Ban Hindus and Jews from a jury hearing a criminal case against an Islamist in Great Britain.
So the grandkids and Karen are in the backyard, hanging out. I'm not paying attention to exposure or the rule of thirds or the background or much of anything. Just a summer day. Oh yes...the background.
And amidst some incredibly frustrating painting (at work) on a cylindrical piece of glass, I ended up with some perfectly stunning — if I may toot my own horn here — leaves and berries. I've mentioned before that painting has never been my forte, and I'm stunned with the completely unexpected joy that arises when I manage to do it right — and beautiful to boot. So: toot.
But it felt ‘so good’ to be cold. And I finished my hat just as we were starting to drive into the curves of our 4-hour drive. It was perfect timing.
Look at me. Look at me. Look at me. Keep me still and keep me locked
I guess I’ll see you in the mirror
For those who are unfamiliar, Jalāl ad-Dīn Muḥammad Rūmī , known as Rumi, was a theologian and scholar and poet of the 13th century in Afghanistan. His native language was Persian but his work has been translated into English(among other languages) and is one of my great inspirations.
A crowd of over 75 people deemed the Fort Greene resident a pillar of her community and a dear friend. Mrs. McKay-Dalton leaves behind a husband and three children, as well as many friends and acquaintances who were touched by her warmth and generosity. "Aileen really loved living in Brooklyn...we're going to miss her forever", said a friend of the family. "She touched everybody that she met", said another friend.
*summarize information
Trading Plan
What if politicians from economically depressed areas of New York State learned that so much state money would help develop luxury condos in the middle of a red-hot real estate market?
I am no stranger to RPGs. The game shelf on my solid wood bookcase is sagging, literally. Everything from Dark Conspiracy, Shadowrun, Call of Cthulhu, Cthulhutech, Star Wars, Mutants and Masterminds, Gamma World, D20 Modern, Paranoia, you name it I’ve at least read about it. I’ve even designed a system myself, I never published it but it was a classless RPG.
3. Ordinary Man (Young Black Scholars, William Nelson & EofA)
The way to do that is to make people watch. The way to do that is to have your best athletes competing. This sport MUST figure out how to do that with some regularity. Because the scattershot appearance schedule of track and field’s best is just not getting it done! Why is this so hard and how do we fix it? I have some ideas on both fronts that I will put out there while we are waiting for our top athletes to start competing!
I used some papers from a MME pad, part of my New Years Resolution to use up some of my massive hoard of papers... and the lovely velvet lace is from LCI - I have a horrible feeling that this lovely pink shade is out of stock (I'm not surprised it's lovely), but there is some gorgeous antique gold lace colour, which I just have to have!!
on a skinny wall like this one between the windows.
Sitting here reminded me of the hour stolen before teaching last Thursday: writing the scene where this elusive character revealed himself, pulling the long unused key to his parents’ house from his wallet, his men turning away in denial of how his hand shook, scraping the brass face of the lock before he could turn the key. The house of the death he’d caused, the main character still thinking him a victim while the shear act of turning away had revealed to him that his closest friends had thought him at fault all along.
I don't know about all that, but I do know that Sadie left this by her bed on the night of her first loss.
This year, another Valentine’s Day will come and go, like it does every year. I’ll think of my life, my loved ones and probably get a postcard from my chiropractor or dentist, wishing me a happy holiday while reminding me to come in for my overdue check up.
Better yet, roast your own! This process is incredibly easy and will produce a very tasty treat without any extra fat, additives or preservatives. You can enjoy nuts this way, or blend them up to make the nut butter of your dreams. Get creative – combine two or more of your favorite roasted nuts and seeds to make delicious nut butter blends, like sesame-cashew, pecan-pumpkin, or almond-hazelnut-sunflower. Just make sure to roast the nuts and seeds separately, as they require different roasting times, respectively.
To some degree, Obama was insulated from the charge of playing petty politics by the fact that his trip took place on the ninth anniversary of President George W. Bush’s notorious ‘mission accomplished’ event on board to USS Abraham Lincoln after the Iraq invasion in 2003.
The issue I have isn't that we should forever never again build a giant skyscraper in Manhattan. My issue is that we should build up, not pander down.
In our brief discussion with Mr. Frank, my son-in-law and I learned of some emerging trends in how hops are used in the brew and we heard tell of a new beer that Deschutes is preparing for larger release. (You lucky folks in Bend, Oregon may already be sampling it in various versions and manifestations, I don’t know.) Just as noteworthy, I sampled some Deschutes beers that I’ve yet to try: Green Lakes Organic, Hop Henge, and….The Abyss, which is ranked in the top 5 beers in the universe and rightly so I can say based just on a couple of samples last week. As a result of those samples, I bought a six-pack of the Green Lakes Organic and a bottle of The Abyss. Let’s talk about the Abyss – or rather, let’s see what some others have had to say; my sampling was not conducive to a decent review but you know I bought a bottle so that should be endorsement enough.
2C Craisins
On May 2nd, the Yinka Dene will rally at the Alberta Legislature and march to the Enbridge office in downtown Edmonton at 11:30am. We welcome everyone to come and join them and help elevate their voices. For more information please check out the facebook event here.
WTF!? This is worse than the damn foreign service exam! So I logged off and went downstairs to watch the Biggest Loser (God that show is addicting! The really sad part is that I always want a snack when I watch it!! Is that wrong?)
Well, to start, on Thursday, I went out to the university to meet with Jane about the classes starting next week. I think it'll go well, except when I got the class lists, I'm the only teacher without any students who have already passed the TOEIC. Great. I also have a huge stack of 3rd year exams to grade. Of course, I haven't so much as glanced at them since bringing them home.
my new acct is: elizaapresley62
and I ask him questions.
Let me tell you: you’re doing a great job. You’re beautiful and everything will be okay.
Prime Minister Yousuf Raza Gilani, after being convicted by the Supreme Court of Pakistan (SC) in the non-implementation of the apex court’s ruling on the National Reconciliation Ordinance (NRO), showed dissatisfaction over the verdict, Geo News reported Thursday.
I am a new runner and still learning a lot about the sport and training. I think of myself as an athletic person, enjoying sports and fitness from middle school through high school. Although, after having children and being a stay at home mom, fitness was put on the back burner behind laundry, meals, diapers, and cleaning.
The surgery was scheduled for 8:45am on Thursday, July 7 (7/7!). The night before and that morning I had to shower with special anti-bacterial soap. That is probably the least interesting detail ever. I don't know why I included it. On the plus side, the story can only go up from there!
Now, what about any of that sounds all that dystopian? There is no dictator that rules over everyone - in fact, the government is made up of those from Abnegation, whose sole purpose is to give and help without a second thought, this is not a selfish government. At 16, you get to choose the type of person you want to be, the work you want to do, what your passion is - no-one tells you where you have to be, it's simply down to you. Everyone has their place, a job, a purpose of their chosing. And everyone works together, it's a society that works! The only thing that makes this dystopian to me is the fact that, even if they work together, they're segregated. There may not be any major animosity, but there is still a feeling of "us and them". So yes, it's a dystopian society, under the guise of being utopian, but one that seems to work! I found it quite fascinating, and was smiling to myself at the idea that life can go well!
Well... I found a wonderful dress, awesome shoes and a nice Cardigan/Top :D
Or any other fkd up thing you can do
The top 10 trends for Google are:
And now I guess I still have options, but I haven’t really taken the time to look into them. I’ve been so transfixed on this one school, because I was oh so confident that It was the ONE university that would get in. Because it seemed relatively easy to get into. And even this school has denied me. I’ve been rejected. I don’t know why. I don’t know why I ever am. I still haven’t caught on to God’s reasoning for any of the bad things that happen to me. I’ve dwelt on them for too long, and I’m losing my hope. But this has happened and haven’t been accepted into the school, and now I must start over again.
Since 2009, Brian May and Roger Taylor have performed as a duo under the original Queen name.
I love the Christmas movies on Hallmark & Lifetime channels.
Sweet, soft lips will not know love’s first kiss,
2. Changing dirty diapers
Oracle & Tarot Goddess
We are excited to see what this year brings - more independence for our family, baptisms this summer for Kaitlyn and Mackenzie, and who knows what adventures, blessings, and challenges await? We pray that we have a wonderful year and hope to focus on the important things in life as our world gets busier around us.
moans and groans you coped admirably!
The elderly lady just about to come in out of the rain and have a spot of tea and an english muffin was simultaneously struggling to close her black umbrella and pull open the entry door at the precise instant when some one obviously lacking self-control was exiting the breakfast shop. As the off-balance patron crashed into her, a sudden gust of wind caught the half-open umbrella and sent it careening out into the morning rush hour traffic!
At the top is the main entrance overhang. The stone wall in front will also get some railings in a similar state of decay.
The Greatest Gift – Almost four years ago, my life and that of my sister’s began to change. I graduated high school at the beginning of June, which meant that in a few short months I would be off to college. I was dealing with the thought of moving to a different state away from all that I knew, but I didn’t realize how much this change was affecting my sister until I found her crying in the car after my graduation ceremony. Instantly, my big sister vibe flared to life and I was ready to kick someone’s ass for hurting my little sister. I asked her why she was crying and, between sobs, she told me it was because I was leaving and with me not being around, we wouldn’t be able to see each other anymore. That brought on me reassuring that we would see each other plenty during holidays and school breaks, and that we still had the entire summer ahead of us to spend time together. (She probably wouldn’t like the fact that I am writing about this, but I’m going to anyway because it needs to be said) That day, we cried together in the parking lot, on the way home, and again later that evening with our family during a gift exchange. We aren’t the kind of family to say “I love you” often, why I don’t know, we just don’t. But what happened that day expressed the love we have for each other more than any words ever could.
Happy Blue-ing!
it sounds so easy
After the development of larger and faster-growing hogs (due to crosses between European and Asian breeds) in the 18th and 19th century, in the United States, backyard and small-scale hog production provided an inexpensive means of converting waste food, crop waste, and garbage into calories (in a relatively small space and in a relatively short period of time). Many of those calories came in the form of fat and rendered lard. Lard was used for almost all cooking and was a fundamental component in many common homestead foods (many that today are still regarded as holiday and comfort foods) like biscuits and pies. The economic/caloric necessity of consuming lard and other saved fats may have led to the popularity of fried foods, not only in the US, but worldwide. In the 19th century cast iron became widely available for use in cooking. The combination of flour, lard, a chicken and a heavy pan placed over a relatively controllable flame became the beginning of today’s fried chicken.
While the Kate and Jack relationship was highlighted at the very beginning of the show and thus often referred to as the "original" pairing, a possible Kate/Sawyer connection was hinted at already in the second half of the Pilot, and it was set in clear and purposeful juxtaposition to the sweet, quiet, instinctual connection Kate formed with Jack by being unexpected, dangerous and "wrong" in all the right ways. Sawyer and Kate's attraction blossomed and was fed by Kate and Sawyer's similar, dark pasts, the former's ironically the main factor in separating Kate and Jack and eclipsing the initial connection between them.
There was a girl with light brown streaks
This Kat attempted for the first time live tweeting from the event. Readers can imagine the comedy scene of fluffy paws trying to operate a smartphone (of an un-named brand), and may amuse themselves perusing the results @EIP_Elements.
What's everyone else been doing over the summer, and how are we all feeling about the onset of Autumn? And is anyone all fired up to get their entry off to New Voices? Let me know if you are so I can cheer you on!
Wow... its been so long (so it seems) since I last blogged, that I'm hoping I remember how to do it LOL.
People rolling through the stop sign come in two types: compliant “give me the ticket” types and ones who argue. Both consistently get tickets – arguing simply slows down the process.
Justin: I love how great the two of you guys are together. I was curious to see how the two of you met?
So much I want to remember about them at each age...
'You know I have to ask.'
The Mössbauer spectrometer, which identifies iron-containing minerals, uses radiation from cobalt-57 in the instrument to elicit a response from molecules in the rock. The half-life of cobalt-57 is only about nine months, so this source has diminished greatly. A measurement that could have been made in less than an hour during the rover’s first year now requires weeks of holding the spectrometer on the target.
24. Ride my bike to the Lake.
Scrap That Moment received a shipment of Graphic 45's Little Darlings collection papers and stickers recently, and I've created three layouts for display in the store. How convenient that we just happen to have a new grandson!
Thanks RA for posting about this. X
This is a stark contrast from what I have observed in France, meaning the French are quite normal and make an effort to limit each festivity within their designated months, and I must admit that I quite prefer the French way of commercialism; it's less annoying.
Not to be rude, but having Science Fair due in December is about the stupidest thing ever. Not that there is ever a good time for Science Fair. It isn't like all the parents sit around and say, " Gee. I have nothing else to do, lets do a Science Fair project."
Things began to change in the spring of 1984 as I thought about teaching the Vietnam War one more time. I kept coming back to two things: my desire to show the impact of the war on those who did not fight in it; and the title of George Herring’s book–Vietnam was “America’s Longest War,” and we had been involved in it in one way or another for twenty-five years. I jotted down a series of key dates in the Vietnam conflict, from 1950, the tentative beginnings of our involvement there, through May 1975, when Saigon fell to the North Vietnamese. Next to each date I briefly noted how old I was at the time, what I was doing, and, where possible, how a particular event affected me. This filled only half a page, but the exercise both personalized the war for me and opened an avenue to explore in a small way the domestic impact of Vietnam. What I had produced was the sketchy odyssey of a kid from the lower middle class growing up during “America’s Longest War.”
My faith in books is slowly being restored. Two good books in a row! What the what?! I was starting to feel I just couldn’t find the worthwhile dystopian young adult books, but luckily I have some friends who do a little of the grunt work for me. Jenna let me borrow this one promising I wouldn’t be disappointed and she delivered.
- Educational Innovation
Heaven does not pose a barrier to the ongoing work of our salvation in Christ.
I’ve tried visualizing my burden as “putting it on the shelf”. Letting God deal with it…
Now I’m not saying that I wouldn’t love for Thom to believe in Jesus. After all, I love Jesus and care about Thom – I’d be crazy not to want that. But I don’t hang out with Thom for that sole purpose. I hang out with Thom, Jayson, Pam and Cheri because they are lovely people with unique talents and I genuinely enjoy their company. They make me a better writer, a better artist and a better person.
The gist of this piece is the usual "the consumer is in charge" baloney (boy, I sure miss the days when I was in charge and zombie consumers would do whatever I said.) According to this piece everyone needs to stop wasting money on ad campaigns and put it all behind social media because...
100. There are 293 ways to make change for a dollar (euro, pound).
It takes the book for Andy to realize and come to terms with the good fortune his immediate family has had, by being able to live and work in Australia. To truly understand the different standard of living, expectations, and challenges for those who remained in Vietnam. Some of that understanding comes from his father, explaining that the reason he was able to emigrate to Australia was that those relatives made tremendous sacrifices to come up with the money to pay for his passage and fare. Andy, in turn, learns that his father has misled his Vietnamese family to think he is richer and more successful than he really is. Noodle Pie is, among other things, the eroding of an us/them, good/bad, familiar/strange mentality.
I’ve said it before, and I still find that to be true. But, this week is the murder trial of my Aunt, and because it’s in another state, I’ve been glued to the news websites there. The problem is, I have to sift to all these other news stories in order to find updates about hers. I find myself getting annoyed at times, because she is my family, I obviously see that as the most important thing happening right now. I’m instantly disgusted with myself for thinking like that, and then even more so when I realize the kind of articles I’m sifting through.
This latest letter includes a quote from the Poet Laureate, Carol Ann Duffy.
Accordingly, one who is no longer a member of this Court at the time a decision is signed and promulgated, cannot validly take part in that decision. As above indicated, the true decision of the Court is the decision signed by the Justices and duly promulgated. Before that decision is so signed and promulgated, there is no decision of the Court to speak of. The vote cast by a member of the Court after deliberation is always understood to be subject to confirmation at the time he has to sign the decision that is to be promulgated. That vote is of no value if it is not thus confirmed by the Justice casting it. The purpose of this practice is apparent. Members of this Court, even after they have cast their vote, wish to preserve their freedom of action till the last moment when they have to sign the decision, so that they may take full advantage of what they may believe to be the best fruit of their most mature reflection and deliberation. In consonance with this practice, before a decision is signed and promulgated, all opinions and conclusions stated during and after the deliberation of the Court, remain in the breast of the Justices, binding upon no one, not even upon the Justices themselves. Of course, they may serve for determining what the opinion of the majority provisionally is and for designating a member to prepare the decision binding unless and until duly signed and promulgated.
Too few of us feel drawn to help our kinsmen or our actual neighbors.
In the past 7 days, I heard from friends that the angels had visited them and carried her mom home to heaven after a time of suffering. A loss, but not to them. Hope abounds. I sat with a friend as he describes his own mom’s slow pilgrammage towards eternity. Cancer is relentless. It pauses but never ceases and in some time near, it will have its shallow victory. I sat in my home church and saw/heard my pastor lead the flock into growth. Well played Pastor, well played. I was part of a 3 day school of orientation for our conference and was delighted to hang out with 19 new pastors/spouses talking about our denom family, but more importantly the work that Jesus has left us to do. I worked with our office staff in doing mega preparations for an upcoming national conference. (Great job by the support staff). I talked to a potential staff person about joining our office team. I handled a couple of tricky phone calls from distressed peoples and pastors. And oh yeah, I snuck a round of golf in there one afternoon when the weather permitted.
Wire wrapping a briolette can be a bit tricky a first when you're just starting out. This was one technique I repeated over and over again to find the kind of style that felt like me. In the picture above I wire wrapped my briolettes so you could still see a little bit of the tip. I'm not sure why that appeals to me, but it just felt like my style.
My Islam is Unity without division or exception
Digital Zoom: 4.1 x
MATT HALISCHUK:
On Monday we walked to the bottom of the hill, and followed the creek through the tree field. The creek winds around through the woods, and onto our property. i was super excited to come across a huge patch of huckleberries (wild blueberries). The bushes are small and scrubby looking, but loaded with blossoms. i can't wait to come back and check them again to see if they actually produce berries. i have a feeling i'll be competing with the local wildlife for them. :)
Yesterday I discovered I Write Like and haven't been able to stop playing with it since. I Write Like is a webform that allows you to enter a sample of your own writing and then compares word choice and writing style of famous writers to your own.
The latter part of Proverbs 3:35 says that shame shall be the promotion of fools. In other words, fools will know shame. Take a few minutes and see how the Bible describes fools. These people will know “greater,” but it will be shame because they refuse wisdom. What then, is the opposite option?
couple of more listens under optimal conditions are needed.
Thanks for stopping by...And to all you moms out there- Happy Mother's Day- you truly have the hardest, most rewarding and amazing job- take special care of yourselves (and your kids!) this weekend!!!
Thirteen escorts and three politically unconnected clients were given the usual choice described by Harvey Silverglate in Three Felonies a Day: go on the stand and lie under oath by repeating the script we write for you, and we’ll let you go; or, refuse to cooperate and we’ll bankrupt you, destroy your family and imprison you for decades. They submitted, sang as directed, and on April 15, 2008 Deborah Palfrey was convicted of money laundering, racketeering and mail fraud (the usual charges government uses to convict people of victimless, consensual “crimes”); she faced a maximum of 55 years in prison, though it’s likely she would have been actually sentenced to about seven or eight years. She never made it that far: two weeks later she was dead, giving the court a convenient excuse to vacate her conviction, thus washing its hands of guilt and ensuring no more important names would be exposed.
That's it for tonight, have a great weekend my friends :)
About thirty percent of those queries didn’t match what Jenny was looking for (posted in her easy to find submissions guidelines). Instant rejections.
I was home
Broken skyline, which way to love land
This first novel has been a huge learning experience but I love it. I can honestly say I’m finding my own path now. Finding what works for me to produce quality work in a relatively short amount of time. Which is good. Because as I draw closer to the end of the book, the more pumped I get to see it in my beta readers hands.
I created this layout for my adorable little nephew, River. He just recently celebrated his first birthday- and I just cannot resist a sweet cake face! SO- I started out by layering some papers to create a distressed, textured background. Now, I definitely like to get the most out of my paper, so when I layer one paper on top of the other, I cut out the backs and use them either to create another smaller layer on top or as scrap bits elsewhere on the page. That is what I did here- even though it appears as if I've used several sheets of paper. To alter the chipboard birdcage and letters, I first painted them with gesso, then used my finger to add some of the Shimmerz paint included in the kit, followed by touching it up by brushing on some pink & sandy-colored ink. I also used the Shimmerz paint & some gesso to alter the large Teresa Collins flower, and even more gesso to dress up the additional flowers, chipboard pieces, and gems. In the end, I created a piece that has just as much "frosting" as the handsome little fellow in the photo.
Highlights include: “Down By The Riverside”, “Old Time Religion” and “Washington & Lee Swing.”
the pipes in your house. Those
Musical snobbery has its unhealthy roots in popular culture. If enough people love (and buy) a particular song, then the elitist saying goes, “it must be crap.” There are exceptions to the rule because sometimes quality songs just can't be denied. Roger Miller's 1964 smash King of The Road comes to mind, as well as The Beach Boys' Good Vibrations, but those are just two examples from the Golden Era of Pop. Don't tell me about all the great singles from The Beatles, British Invasion or Motown, because the Sixties was the time before Big Business got a real stranglehold on the music. Popular Music went downhill fast in terms of quality starting in the 1970's, when calculated fluff took over the airwaves and your local radio DJ become a puppet to corporate profiteers. The 70s saw the rise of Barry Manilow's super-schmaltz formula, The Bee Gees hollow disco, and Olivia Newton-John's plastic world of joy. The 80s were just as bad with Hall & Oates, Billy Joel and the impossibly sappy Air Supply. If you add Mariah Carey to this list representing the 90's, you would have a great set of mega-selling "artists" who collectively haven't received a good review in forty years. The music executives of corporate America have been fleecing you and your loved ones out of hard earned money for a long time now. They have it down to a science including focus groups telling them what kind of music to sell, with demographic trends and promotional budgets targeting the weak and easily duped.
Florida State Parks
Monkey Business Promotions can help you stand out at the EXPO. We are very creative and customer service oriented and will help you come up with the perfect promotional product for you!
No card today :). I am using today to study my other favorite thing to do... photography. My husband is so sweet. He knew that I wanted a good camera that I can really play with, so he got me a Canon EOS 7D :D. Can I say that I LOVE my camera?!!!!
What you don't know you can feel it somehow
I've been doing well continuing my copious vegetable consumption. Today I motored down an orange, 2 cups of blackberries, a turkey mash thing I made with a cup each of kale, cabbage, and peppers, and three cups of spinach per serving. What else. Cole slaw, which was a little over a cup of cabbage. I am going to shit well my friends.
While many say the fact both sides reached referendum day without a relapse into war was an achievement in itself, some burning issues have yet to be resolved, such as where the new border will run and how Sudan's oil revenues will be shared.
Before you start to feel as panicked (as we did), let me assure you that right now, Sam is pink and snoring happily away in his vibrating chair. To make a long story short, we think that Sam’s upstairs oxygen equipment failed last night. He has an oxygen generator upstairs in his bedroom and a regular tank downstairs, and within 30 minutes of switching him from his upstairs to his downstairs oxygen, his sats perked up to the high 70s. Unfortunately, he was probably satting in the 60s all night, so it took him a little while to recover this morning. We called his cardiologist, and she said that as long as sats remain stable on the downstairs equipment, we don’t need to bring him in.
We went out to eat after, but I had totally lost my appetite in the excitement and could hardly eat a thing. I seemed to have no problem with the champagne though :)
I absolutely love stumbling upon something that already looks like a work of art on the hanger, which is just how this dress appeared to me (see my haul with it here). It could just be my inner girly girliness speaking, but I find immersing yourself and flouncing around in a bundle of soft, chiffon pink layers to be one of the biggest mood-lifters clothes can offer you without making you spend more money.
A simple yet tasty way of making pâté - no need for enamelled cast iron terrine or bain marie. Specifically for the purpose of schmearing into this particular bánh mì combo, I like the texture of the liver pâté super smooth, as I prefer the velvety contrast against the other of my chosen elements, all of which have plenty variegated texture, chew and crunch. Also, it is not too barnyardy in character, as evidenced by the abundant use of counterbalancing dairy product (a.k.a. butter). In bánh mì, it’s all about balance, be it in terms of texture or taste.
America, the Empire, is history. The Standard & Poor's downgrading of the U.S.'s credit rating this past August 5th, 2011 is just the beginning.
The boy recognized his footsteps and asked, 'Were you the one who changed my sign this morning? What did you write?'
It is a Beautiful Disaster,
Consider the ending. The ex-con and his son, having fought off a bumbling copper in thrilling fashion on the trembling flatbed of a speeding train, have now holed themselves in an abandoned shack, somewhere in the desert countryside, and are now surrounded by the authorities. Gun-barrels are poised by all.
Social: How do you wish to contribute to the world? Is there a cause that you support? Maybe you enjoy being around people that you have something in common with. There are many ways to connect, not just with people, but also with animals and the environment.
Daniel Peter Farrell (Con) 399
∙ Solar cell technology is advancing so fast that even without that internalization fracking will soon be uneconomic anyway.5. Virtually no corner of the state will be unaffected by fracking’s external costs:
Yeah. Again.
We detected 310 matching encrypted numbers, accounting for 143 priests with
All this has been going on with help from numerous hands over the last couple of months. I can't wait until we can flush the toilet and wash our hands in the sink!
We don’t talk about money, except he’ll tell me I spend to much, but he won’t discuss with me priorities of money or create a budget with me or anything.
I can't imagine what her head weighs. And she was a little smelly.
Sen Miriam: I’m only asking if you’re ready or not. It’s answerable by a simple yes or no. Did I ask you to elaborate!? No! Wha!
‘Sir Adrian brings with him a wealth of experience and knowledge of the role of the private sector in boosting infrastructure investment and of housing policy, making him an excellent choice to lead the review.’
My son wanted a Pirate theme for his party. So I got to work on creating a cake. Started with chocolate sheet cake and covered it with a marbled white and blue gel dye added to it. Looks like water that way. Then I created a yellow cake which I mutilated to create an island and ship. Again more fondant I tried for a creamy sand color and got coral.
Police said 26 people were in custody by Wednesday afternoon, including former Winnipeg fashion model turned full-patch biker Sean Sebastian Wolfe. Police were still searching for eight more accused on warrants. Their names have not been released.
So no scenes. No huge drama, no crying, no threats, or promises. Just a “When can I get the rest?” and a “You’re my only comfort and my nearest friend. So don’t stop talking to me, okay?”
Micha, my Micha, and I hurt so much
I've also got to know who all the children's TV presenters are now. They invariably portray perky, smiley, intensely annoying caricatures designed to appeal to their target audience, and they do it well.
Genre : Romance, Tragedy
7. Catalogs for seed/plant companies that actually ship to our forsaken state. We are part of mainland America. This fact seems to have escaped the notice of some mail order companies. I’ve received calls from nurseries telling me sadly, after I’ve placed an order, that “we don’t ship to Alaska.”
And that broke my heart when I realized how badly I had broken your heart. How I had ignored your needs and wants for my own. You were always, always giving your Self away but never, ever taking anything for your Self in return.
Plus, one of the advantages of being able to control the content in your book is to be able to include links to your blog, Facebook page, Twitter, etc -- and to your newsletter signup page. If someone has just enjoyed your book, it's possible they might want to know when your next book is due out. Let them know they can receive an email when it's released.
This song also has special meaning for me because my oldest son, Jeremiah, and I decided a few years ago that this was our theme song. Yes, we may feel like we sometimes want to hide away somewhere and lock the door, and that is ok. We also recognize that at these moments, we may have lost a single battle, but not the war. We look to tomorrow as another day, a brand new day, putting the struggles of yesterday behind us and ready to face what is ahead of us with a clean slate and renewed strength.
This session was one of those that got thrown together at the last moment. As a group, we want to get to play as often as we can with Dn. Goram’s player before he heads off to his graduate studies. Therefore, when there is window for him to play, we usually try to take advantage.
And I am totally thrilled with the results! Even though over 20 people signed up for the course, Diane helped me personally learn my way around the online classroom. Once I signed in I had access to class forums where discussions could be held amongst the students and teacher. The lessons were broken down into manageable sections with each week's lessons released at the beginning of the week. The lessons were multi-media, encompassing videos, audio, and writing with images and diagrams. Also there were checklists and worksheets I could download. Each lesson had a space for discussion and questions. Also Diane was available for questions privately through one-on-one email. The lessons stay up for the duration of the course and for a certain time period after so you can access them at your own pace.
Over all the plain
I have to work for a few hours, then it's off to CKC TULSA! I'm so excited, I've never gone before. I'm a member of a great group of scrappers, Croppin Crashers of Conway and five of us are piling in the car and heading to OK. I was like a kid on Christmas Eve last night, couldn't fall asleep. LOL
Return on investment or: "how much for how much"?
next day,
*1 cup dates
Pennard Castle
When I saw the inspiration photo, I thought of fall being harvesting time. But since I don't have Flourishes "Garden Fresh" or "Season of Thanks", I decided to start at the beginning. It all starts with seeds. If we don't plant anything, we don't reap our harvest :)
Denied! One scholarly resident of Virginia City tells me that saloons there never had the famous swinging doors so beloved of Western movies. One reason may have been the hurricane force wind fondly known by the locals as the "Washoe Zephyr". It was strong enough to blow off tin roofs and carry away small mammals.
What is your knitting pattern queue? Do you use Ravelry? Do you have a notebook? Do you have patterns downloaded and saved on your computer?
I won't say "I quit" KDVS or this blog because I know I'll be subbing for DJs who are out sick or outta town or pulling all-nighters for study or term papers, but I can't forecast the frequency of these radio appearances. I do promise that I'll continue to post 'em up right here so you can have a listen. I might also be using this blog for more writing. I used to do a lot more of that before my weekly schedule began to get too crowded.
Trevor showing off the MANY presents he also received. I don’t remember racking it in on my brother’s birthday. When did this tradition start, or perhaps a better question: at what age does this stop?
Now, flip it. As mentioned, the Padres have been in Petco Park since 2004 -- not that long a time. But in that time they have won a Cy Young (Jake Peavy), they almost won another (Trevor Hoffman barely finished second one year), and Mat Latos received some Cy Young consideration as a 22-year-old. The Rangers, meanwhile, have never won a Cy Young award and going going back to the start of the Ballpark at Arlington, only one Rangers pitcher even finished in the Top 5 in the vote getting (Aaron Sele finished fifth one year).
Estimates based on insulating a gas-heated, semi-detached home with three bedrooms.
The next time he came round, I invited him into my trailer for some lemonade and addressed him as follows:
Remember to follow their themes and please, do not forget to leave the Design team Ladies some loving comments on their work.
~Shell
Something shall change! As you can see, there is barely a path to walk into the Little House. There is furniture, recycle bins, twigs for kindling, tools for yard work, metal sculpture, hoses, wood bins, and unfinished projects throughout the space. This looks like a task for…. Serenity Woman!
Membership has apparently soared since then. More members, allowed to cast three times the votes, but actually casting fewer in total – why would that be?
Arid interrogation: yet the dread
Im gonna tell you all about her later.
1. Choose Your Friends Wisely
Of course, you or I could devise a better plan, but no one wants to make either of us dictator (thank God, eh?).
Good to know... now off to check the direction of a little elephant figurine's trunk.
My main issue with the pilot was that it wasn’t quite as funny as I expected. There is a lot going on and with the rapid dialogue it wasn’t always clear what was always going on. I think that style will be fine once we get to know the characters, but for the first episode it was a little confusing. Not Game of Thrones confusing, but enough that it distracted me a bit from what was going on. There is a lot of cussing in the show and that isn’t something that I am against. However I thought they relied a little too much on cursing as the punch line in the pilot. As I mentioned in my Jim Jefferies review, there needs to be more to a joke than it is just shocking or using somewhat shocking language.
Never give up. Focus on my call, my art, my joy, my task and see it through.
And no Jeremy Lin rookie cards… : (
April 21, 2012
Few drop of mango essence (i added 2 drops of vanilla essence )
I bought some cute scroll brackets at the hardware store. They were originally a bronzy color but I spray-painted them the same gold color as the legs on my IKEA trestle desk.
I mean, the infrastructure bank that we’ve proposed is relatively small. But could we imagine a project where we’re rebuilding roads and bridges and ports and schools and broadband lines and smart grids, and taking all those construction workers and putting them to work right now? I can imagine a very aggressive program like that that I think the American people would rally around and would be good for the economy not just next year or the year after, but for the next 20 or 30 years.
I found this soup in a recent issue of Cooking Light and since it was a "superfast" meal, I knew it would be perfect to make on a night when my son has Cub Scouts. I added some green pepper (also from the garden) and used swiss chard instead of spinach. Quick and Easy!
The children help place straw on our bare wooden table reminding us that Jesus was laid in a manger of straw. Then we lay the Christmas table cloth on top (this table cloth was made by my hubby's grandmother, traditionally the table cloth should be white). Next we put the table settings on and then we add the center piece. The berry wreath is both beautiful and useful. Without it our wheat sheaf would topple over (sometimes they still do...). Our book on Polish Christmas traditions (A Polish Christmas Eve by Rev. Czeslaw Michal Krysa also found here at at the Polish Art Center) suggests using a weighted down soda bottle as a container for holding the wheat (straw) sheaf.
Also, if you are looking for something fun, check out the Tomato Battle guys. We did the Colorado tomato battle and it was awesome! There are pictures on facebook. Couple of tips if you decide to attend: Do not wear flip flops, they do not stay on when you attempt to walk through ankle deep tomato guts (lots of people did this, and lots of flip flops floated away). Goggles larger than your typical swimming goggles would be advantageous. The smaller goggles get smacked around too easily when you are hit in the face with a tomato. Do not take cameras unless they are completely waterproof, you may be surprised how damp a tomato fight can get. Take about 20 gallons of water, a couple of buckets, and washcloths to clean up afterwards. Just trust me on this one.
Polaroids by Helmut Newton
So this is why you will never hear about or see on TV the mutilated corpses of countless innocent White South African men, women and children of all ages, who were raped, tortured and executed in their own homes simply because they are White.
There you go, that is the end. We went for some McD's after the appointment, and headed back to Nana and Opa's house. That night, we had dinner with my mom, Nana and Opa for the last time of our trip. The next day, we headed back to Hawaii and thankfully experienced a very uneventful flight.
LW, yikes. I suppose the lesson here is not to start a family business with someone that you’re not married to. But that lesson doesn’t do you much good. What I recommend is to fake your boyfriend’s death. I’ve seen it work in the movies and I’m 100% certain it will work now. Good luck.
Beat the ten egg-yolks with the sugar until creamy. Heat the milk with the scraped-out vanilla bean seeds, adding egg cream and gelatine. While constantly stirring with a whisk, bring the cream to the boil. Add the drained candied fruit. Take the pan off the stove and immerse it in the iced water. Keep stirring until the cream cools off.
They only have themselves to blame for getting into this position in the first place. If they bothered to follow the First Amendment Establishment Clause in the beginning, they wouldn’t have this problem; but nooooo, they had to try pushing their religious beliefs.
on black paper
The Opposite of Amber -Gillian Philip,
Despite his declaration that the new frame rate would offer up hyper-real visuals with a clarity and depth audiences don’t get at 24 fps, providing a richer, more immersive big-screen experience, several film exhibitors and bloggers felt 48 fps wasn’t “cinematic” enough in the vein of his Lord of the Rings trilogy, comparing it to the crisp imagery people find on a hi-def television set.
from the very first day you had my heart
Caveat: This is directed more towards Western Europe. Eastern Europe is a whole different ballgame.
brooches
MG: His ability to see the play happen before it happens, his knowledge of the game, and his intelligence will allow him to be a 12+ year player in the NFL. If he can stay healthy, he has a chance to be an All-Pro for a decade.
Democratic Leader Danny Morgan studied hoarding last year when he was approached by a constituent to look into the death of Kitty Lewis, an Oklahoma City woman who lived for years and died alone in a home that had been deemed uninhabitable by county officials. Terry Humphrey, the director of the city of Edmond’s code enforcement division, contributed to the interim study and sought legislative action to add municipal employees to the list of mandated reporters to the Department of Human Services, as code enforcement officers are often the first to see deteriorating living conditions. Representative Morgan was able to include this language in House Bill 2999, which was signed by the Governor and will take effect in November.
Asst. Solicitor General Esmeraldo Umali and Solicitor Dominador Quiros for appellees Sec. of Agriculture and Natural Resources and Director of Forestry.
My work at the office has ended but I didn’t want to go home just yet. Our anniversary was the next day. I wanted to be away from everything, away from everything that reminded me of her. I took my phone and dialled a number. It was the dealer’s. The dealer was someone everyone called if they needed anything ‘out the back’ as he phrased it.
We are currently planning a protest at the Pickfair Lot for the morning of Sunday the 1st of April….or as the City of West Hollywood will be declaring “Kardashian Day” (NO FOOLIN!)
Does Michelle Obama Know About This?
Angel Six: “All of this has happened before.”
This was mainly because, as regular readers will know, I was in Virginia and Viognier is a real speciality there. The Virginians seem to enjoy a little alliteration in their wine names, with Virginia Viognier, Virginia Verdejo and my favourite, the almost Dr. Seuss-like Horton Norton.
Corinne Masiero gives a forceful performance as Louise. The character’s stubbornness and self-destructiveness add a tension to her desperation. Mennegun describes her as “a character who won’t give in.” She was inspired by actual characters, including bits of Mennegun’s mother and aunt who “had money and lost everything overnight when their husbands left them.”
There isn’t any NDS files to download for this toy yet so the games I’m playing are all legit. If any other cheap lager enthusiasts follow things Nintendo, feel free to keep me informed when compatible flashcards like R4 are released.
How often do we show children that we are wrong? As often as we are wrong. If we are right in a world isn’t fair way, then we talk about why it is right even though it isn’t fair.
here's bonz right when we got home, smiling about the results:
In the dates leading up to surgery, I was nervous. I’m the type of girl who will give blood, but the chances of me getting cold sweats, passing out, and throwing up are pretty good. So, knowing that they were going to put me under, put a tube down my throat, and cut on me was scary; like run a fever and diarrhea scary. At least I was getting thinner and had a pretty flushed look to my skin, right?
For this You loved me again,
The Nestling Sparrow wants to come live in your cave with you, and as I am willing to ship him off, I think you should give me your location. If you eat the Nestling Sparrow, please don't bother telling me; I'd rather not know. I'll just think of him, all happy and laughing, while I finally lay down to get some fucking sleep.
Separately, Pottermore executive Charlie Redmayne told the Guardian it was Rowling's decision to offer the Harry Potter ebooks DRM-free, because she "personally believes that if someone's bought an ebook they ought to be able to read it on their Sony Reader, their Kindle, their iPad, their PC." He adds are still "having conversations with Apple" about an affiliate sales relationship for the Potter ebooks, "but there is no date, no agreement."
A few this week as we had so many FAB entries
The battery cannot be removed or replaced either, so don’t be thinking you can keep a spare in your bag – that’s out of the question.
“So, what do you do for yourself?”
And, dang it, while I'm regretting what Farno did to my brain, I sure miss that sweet face!
The Good Men Project is a seemingly well-intentioned group of cuddly men's rights activists. They're ostensibly not the outwardly sexist 'Why isn't there an International Men's Day, bitches?' whiners invading feminist blog comment sections and dribbling their entitled slobber all over the place. These are the guys who just think that, hey, us totally non-creepy guys who've never even hit a woman - even when she really deserved it - need a voice too. And so I come to In Praise of Small-Breasted Women, by the "writer and singer/songwriter" Mark 'No, not THAT Mark Radcliffe' Radcliffe.
(2) that the document has been particularly described by the applicant and its
in each breath, each step and moment
Ha! I was surprised to find this, the first time I had any inkling that Berkshire had quoted my Ale Street News column from 2009 on the lack of respect pale ale gets from the geekerie. It's fun to see your name on a label; hell of a lot more fun than on a wanted poster, I assume!
You have the cool, clear
Still with me? Well done.
She turned into my son as he was twenty-eight years ago;
Harry Potter and the Philosopher’s Stone by J.K.Rowling
Sorry for the long wait. Last year was a very hard year. I nearly lost my husband for the second time in December 2010 due to a heart attack. He is fine now and doing well. He is disabled due to his type 1 diabetes and end stage kidney disease. He is on a waiting list now for a new kidney and pancreas by the end of this year. That is the estimation for his surgery. We have been through a lot. God has blessed us very much with everything we have gone through. We are looking forward to having a great year.
With a vaginal sensor and biofeedback monitor, two 20-minute sessions per day for seven to nine months-with a specific goal such as holding 45-microvolts for 60 seconds—can relieve vulvar vestibular pain in the majority of women.
... “When she told him that she loved him, his response was not “I love you, too” but “thank you”—as though he appreciated that someone loved him.”
I have been feeling overwhelmed by all the stuff (read clutter) we have accumulated in the 4 years we have been in this house (some of it has been around for much longer), and decided to do something about it. I have been reading Simplicity Parenting by Payne. If you are feeling overwhelmed by all the choices that face you and your children, feel stressed by trying to fit everything into the day, are overscheduled and not overjoyed, you should check out this book. It will help you simplify your children's lives which in turn will simplify yours. And I'm all about simple.
Adult CPR Instructions
In 2010, a mumps outbreak occurred among 1000 children in upper New Jersey and lower New York. Almost 80% of them had been vaccinated with the MMR (measles, mumps & rubella) vaccine.
In the forecourt there'd be grubby gypsies stripped to the waist, banging and bashing away to give some worth to the worthless. Someone suddenly taking up an old fashioned boxing stance, sweat glistening off his chest as he jabbed and hooked away at unknown forces. The sun cooking pale Irish skin red, engine oil bubbling with the tarmac, the heat rising and the world wavering through it the other side.
Layout and Atmosphere: it's a really nice room. Basically it's a church hall/concert hall/school hall sort of space. The floor is the right shape and good quality, and there's plenty of chairs with big, restaurant-style tables along the two long sides. The furniture is bulky and a bit crowded together, making it tricky to get into and out of the seats. You come in at the end where there's a stage (on which is the DJ box), and at the far end of the rectangular floor is a mezzanine with a staffed bar underneath. The lighting is quite good, and the space is pretty, with ornate upper walls. It doesn't get elaborated for the tango, except by projecting coloured light from the mezzanine. I suggest going up the stairs to the mezzanine to hang up your coat and change your shoes - there's much more room than there is on the rail downstairs, where your coat can end up blocking the door to the Ladies, and from up there you get an interesting view of the floor. I think your stuff would be perfectly safe. One time there was an elderly man sitting up there and looking lugubriously towards the stage, paying no attention to the dancers or anything else.
Part 5: Awaken/Panic/Restraint
It's OK that I'm letting go of pressuring things to go 'my way'.
Don’t be a wimp. Say I love you to your best friend, child, dad, friends that matter, girlfriend, grandparents, husband, mom, partner, son… just everyone who matters to you. Make their day beautiful with the knowledge that, no matter how their day is going, they are loved.
Create some art. Doodles are fun, sure. But get more creative. Staples? Markers? Highlighters? Post-it notes? I dunno! Be bold. Example from my personal collection (COPYRIGHTED!!!):
Format: Invasion is a sci-fi/mystery/government espionage YA novel. It stands at 320 pages and was published by Thomas Nelson on January 4th, 2011. It is the first book in a series known as C.H.A.O.S.
Meanwhile the 50th annual BC Human Resources Management Association Conference & Tradeshow is taking place at our popular new Vancouver Convention Centre where seemingly somewhat unconventional, Canada’s comedian Rick Mercer’s resourcefulness will no doubt have delegates laughing!…
“Where y’all headin’, Brit?” he asked when he saw Spencer’s Bowler hat.
3 cloves garlic (minced)
Press Release January 27, 2011
4th row - Grayson's jeans, Grayson's pj's/underwear, little twins' clothes, Sunday basket (church jeans, belts, and clothes to be worn - we put those in Sat night so they can just grab and go on Sun morning)
Little Satan doesn’t have the safety of distance, nor do we have Great Satan Air Force’s advanced fleet of bombers and fighters. America could carry out an extensive air campaign using stealth technology and huge amounts of ammunition, dropping enormous payloads that are capable of hitting targets and penetrating to depths far beyond what Little Satan’s arsenal can achieve. This gives America more time than Little Satan in determining when the moment of decision has finally been reached. And as that moment draws closer, differing timetables are becoming a source of tension. in determining when the moment of decision has finally been reached. And as that moment draws closer, differing timetables are becoming a source of tension. Asking Little Satan’s leaders to abide by America’s timetable, and hence allowing Little Satan’s window of opportunity to be closed, is to make Washington a de facto proxy for Little Satan’s security — a tremendous leap of faith for Little Satan faced with a looming Iranian bomb. It doesn’t help when American officials warn Little Satan against acting without clarifying what Great Satan intends to do once its own red lines are crossed. What is needed is an ironclad American assurance that if refrains from acting in its own window of opportunity — and all other options have failed to halt Tehran’s nuclear quest — Washington will act to prevent a nuclear Iran while it is still within its power to do so.
But that has to stop and deep down inside you really do know why don't you?
The PAN card-Aadhar card, according to the official, is being developed as a “national identifier” document by the Government.
It was just like the way a mother would find the strength to lift a car off of her child if she had to. My efforts paid off and Jack moved down a little more. Then Lori used her scissors and made a small cut to widen the opening. Apparently, it wasn’t enough- she told Jake not to look (but of course he did anyway) and made the cut bigger (a fourth-degree episiotomy). Before we knew it, Jack slid out (at 7:51 a.m.)! The physical relief of the push that got him out was great. I’ll always remember the feeling of his warm, wet body
I made them on the same, single sheet of watercolour paper.
“Tommy shouts, “I didn’t hear you right.”
~Willian Shakespeare
The Pitman Painters play by Lee Hall, is now showing in Seattle. I wrote to the Theatre to tell them my dad was one of the Ashington Art Group and I have some of his paintings. "Would they like to see them?" I asked. I was invited to a nice lunch with the cast of the show and we talked for about another hour with a reporter from the Seattle Times ..........before stopping off at the pub.
To name the unrecognized
Huntington has since left the Secret Service.
I started this project off by integrating altered versions of some of the exhibit photos directly into the envelopes that make up the album. I kind of wanted to make them the base of the album, since the exhibit was the starting point for our whole trip. On two of the pages I printed the altered photos directly onto the envelopes.
The U.S. embrace of Asian fusion cuisine, and fusion cooking in general, “is mainly because of America’s diversity,” Comerford said. That popularity will continue to grow, judging by the adventurous and increasingly cosmopolitan tastes of young diners, she added. She mentioned her own daughter as a case in point.
Under the Big Top 4500308
The discount chain offers a jumble of merchandise in its crowded, overflowing aisles. But make no mistake this is not Japan’s answer to K-Mart or the now defunct Woolworths.
However, there is at least some suggestion that Audrey, David and Kylie were operating as a partnership. In the absence of any partnership agreement, this relationship must be analysed within the terms of the Partnership Act 1890. The Act states that a partnership exists merely when persons carry on “a business in common with a view of profit”. A partnership does not need any agreement or other formalities to exist. Ownership of relevant property is a factor in determining the existence of a partnership, but it is not the sole or conclusive factor. It can be argued that even though the freehold in the salon was signed over to David and Kylie, there was an implied licence for the partnership to continue operating out of No 2, so Audrey cannot be locked out. The 1890 Act does contain provisions concerning partnership property. It may be even be possible to argue that the freehold of No 2 is partnership property.
It was still a bit overcast as I arrived at the beach, but as the sun climbed in the sky, the clouds quickly disappeared. The entrance onto the beach was proof of how hard a winter the NJ coast experienced this year. Heavy machinery had been moving sand around, trying to create new support dunes to keep the high tide away from the expensive beach-front homes.
While it may take the industry time to recover from the Winehouse’s passing, her place in history as a musical legend looks more than secure. Watch this space for more…
On the whole Will's article is a beautiful elegy to two art forms that have brought pleasure and joy to millions and whose essence remains (despite the current Ikea approach to fiction- and song-writing. Your work is already boxed in; all you have to do is assemble it) the creation of alternative scenarios in which the human experience can be seen in all its glory. Whether guardianship of a Divine Providence is included or not, it doesn't matter. It's still welcomed all the same.
I want to lay down and die.
108) I'd like to make, photograph and list new items for my shop at least once every two weeks.
anybody else need anything?
God morning! Here we have a really rainy day today. But my dhs sons girlfriend came over and took our little babygirl out for a walk anyways. So i had some mummy time, AGAIN!!!Yeah!
The offences are said to have happened in and around Rochdale, Greater Manchester, in 2008 and 2009.
The animals are positive. Jensen, is happy, bouncy (a bit of a Tigger really) and gives off such positive emotions.
But my perception was changed after watching a series called "THE ARRIVALS". It a series of documentaries REINTRODUCING us to our true enemy. I will call it a reintroduction because i think we all have forgotten about him. Yes we know that there is a devil that tells us to do wrong things, and yes we know that he will be locked in the holy month of ramadan. But that was all i knew about him.
Who better than to “create with me” than my dear Sister GS Creations and between all the CT throwing in ideas, and my sisters fantastic templates, this is the result.
under the street lamps,
Most were insubstantial, breezy. But for three novels, the three collected in 'The Spider vs. the Empire State', Page created a more serious menace, a iron-handed regime called the Black Police who takes over the government of New York and wrings taxes (often by force) from the poorest citizens. Page's creation would parallel the rise of Nazi Germany, employing dark political sentiment in a literature usually devoted to the glamour of the underworld.
In 2008, Lorillard Tobacco was entered into a separation agreement with its parent company Loews, and became an independent publicly traded company.
I believed that some flaw, some imperfection in me made him do those things......
But as I pedaled along next to him I realized he was no better than me. With his perfect physical condition and his two fit flesh and bone legs, he was not that different from me. He was getting a good work out on that bike. So was I. My resistance levels might have been different than his, but I was full into my work out, just like him.
Damn, I love to learn.
We see, then, that there are things more desirable to the masculine mind than the mere charms of the flesh. To be beautiful is a good thing, for which we should thank Nature--to be attractive, morally, rather than physically, is, however, a thing for which we should thank Nature even more, if she be good enough to have endowed us with that lasting quality. Let a girl learn once for all that her little schoolgirl airs and graces can please only the unintellectual of her set, that to make a good match, in the most noble sense of the word, is to form herself to be the equal of the man she marries, and all will be right. I speak advisedly, because a girl who has the courage to so plan out her future is very unlikely to wed with any save the most desirable of the other sex.
The island kids were extremely enthusiastic about being part of this project - and I believe that it gave them a better sense of awareness, ownership and pride over this building - that would be handed over to them once the Arkitrekkers were gone.
4) Cloth diapers: Yes or No? I tried them for a few weeks but ended up switching to disposables. I couldn’t keep up with the laundry and considering how much bleach I used to get the formula-poop stains out of the pre-folds, I wasn’t being “earth-friendly” anyway. Also I spent 3 months (Months 2-4) as a single mom while my husband was getting settled in Rio, it was just another thing I couldn’t keep up with.
But, about 5 years ago or so, my body betrayed me in a horrible way by growing one — ONE! – hair on my chin. And in a cruel twist of fate, it was blonde, so I didn’t know it was growing there until it was somewhat impressive in length. Yes. I can feel so many of you turning away from this post in disgust. But, I’m trying to help my fellow woman, so I will endure your distaste as a martyr should.
Goddamn you ‘Tomorrow’s World’! Where is the sweet-smelling utopia you promised me in the late 70′s?
Another great poem speaks to me of their loss. It's an almost tender lament for the loss of so much of the nation's youth. Read it, remember, and weep.
This post was not supposed to be occupied by sex but it turns out the subject is kind of unavoidable. Perhaps because my mind can’t seem to escape it.
Beside the rivers of Babylon, we sat and wept
I have been very busy. We are selling our house and I have twenty five thousand projects in the air. Not to mention, regular day (night) job and mommying. I loathe to shut down the blog even though I don't have as much time for it. So I'm not going to. There will be gaps. It's just the way life is playing me right now. But there will still be lots of love, so hold your breathe with me guys. Thanks! And enough about me, check out what I've found online.
By 1959 the company already had 300 stores part of this growth was by acquiring another store chain. One of the momentous events in the company’s history was when it was purchased by IEL in 1989 and it was delisted in the stock exchange, 65 years after it was first listed. In 1993 the company was again offered to the public and relisted in the stock exchange.
Special equipment: plastic pipette, canning jars
The intermittent unit, driven by a flange connected, concentric running synchronous motor, mostly eliminates vertical and horizontal picture weave and results in very smooth running and optimum picture steadiness. For gentle treatment of the film, the starting ramp up of the synchronous motor is adjustable and has been pre-adjusted to the optimum value in the factory.
"V.P.A" (from Vale) - Golden ale. 4.2% ABV
The lip crayon became a firm favourite immediately, it’s gentle pink transforms on your lips creating a shade unique to you. For me it goes an almost neon pinky-berry, which I love. A friend of mine had a go and it stayed a much lighter shade on her – so it definitely works!
I was so proud at how brave my nana was. She had never been to hosiptal and I'm sure at times it was all a little daunting. I knew by her she didn't understand somethings, so I'd explain everything to her and tell her things like - why they were checking her blood pressure so often.
But the biggest problem is that everyone plausibly acts and re-acts as if this were a Western, with giant bunnies stepping in for Black Bart and his mangy gang of outlaws tearing through the one-horse town...eating people. To be perfectly honest, there is not one moment of this thing that can be taken seriously as a horror movie, an ecological message movie, or even a movie movie for that matter.
Anyways, here's my Birthday Card...
I received a sturdy black envelope with a hardcover book inside. A durable cardstock insert explained that as a Wall Street Journal reader, I was selected to receive this lookbook for the Devi Kroell spring summer 2012 accessories collection, and encouraged to explore it more in their East Hampton or Madison Avenue boutique. (I imagine they targeted female WSJ readers in the NYC area of a certain age.) The book itself was beautiful, but seemed over-the-top and unnecessary, as I imagine the majority of women who receive this will at the very most thumb through quickly (as I did). With Devi Kroell prices ranging from $690 to $20,000, I understand that an average purchase far beyond recoups the cost of printing these books, but really? I’m curious who foots the cost of printing the books: WSJ or Devi Kroell. I suspect it’s part of a “value-add” package that the WSJ provides clients whose ad spend exceeds a certain amount (so the costs are merely passed along), but not certain. Regardless of who pays, doesn’t seem like the most effective marketing to me.
When my life is over and some may say that it is finished then I hope the thousands that I reached will see God’s Kingdom multiplied by a revival of family. I am not sure who is greater… the world changer or the mother and father of a world changer. I hope I’m both!
So when I read that tonight’s episode was centered on Earl having a heart attack, I was definitely a little worried and apprehensive. The supporting characters are definitely not the strong part of this show and I immediately thought this would probably be one of their worst episodes. Was I right? Sadly yes.
Retail shortages of Rahr & Sons beer may occur in the short term, but the losses and repairs are expected to be covered by insurance.
I was busy Friday morning finishing the last list, for the last trip to the store, when the call came that the Guest of Honor and his siblings were not going to make it. For now, I will just "Sugarcoat" it and will explain at a later time and in FULL the details of just what a certain ex pulled, AGAIN! I couldn't believe it, that as busy as I felt just minutes before, a sudden halt came over me and I was just numb. I will say it took me for a spin! Quickly we had to pull it together for the other many small children questioning why they weren't coming. Unfortunately, 2 of them have been hurt by her doing this very thing many times before. Sad to say it but they are beginning to understand more then we would like.
The biggest barrier between the mujahidin and freeing al-Aqsa were the tyrant rulers. Now that the friends of America and Israel are being mopped out one after the other, our aspirations are great that the path between us and al-Aqsa is clearing up.
"I've noticed you around.
The bottom line is AJ McCarron had a one year head start on Sims and managed to hold him off long enough to finally win the job. Once he got the job, he did nothing to lose it. Thems the breaks.
Hamilton rejects the claim “that the legislative body are themselves the constitutional judges of their own powers” as unsupported by “any particular provisions in the Constitution.” To suppose “that the Constitution could intend to enable the representatives of the people to substitute their will to that of their constituents” makes no sense to Hamilton.
I have wanted to make monogram cards for a while now. I decided today was the day. This is a 4x4 card. I cut the two squares on it from George and Basic Shapes, the scalloped square is from Winter Woodland and the M is from Paper Lace. The black layer is embossed with D'vine swirls, which is probably my favorite Cuttlebug folder, the Ribbon is from Michael's. I clearly went for the "faux" stitching and used my black Sakura Jelly Roll pen for that. They are simple, but I love how they turned out.
Found out a friend of mine--my age and a mother of two--has been diagnosed with breast cancer. Again. Her first round was about a year-and-a-half ago, and she caught it early, treated it w/radiation, and it went away. But this time, it's more serious and she's opting for a double mastectomy. She's going to be fine--I just know it--but I also know that she's the absolute glue that holds her family together. I worry about how they're going to do during all of this almost as much as I worry about her. Fucking cancer...
Not only did you agree with Herzl over the dangers in store, you worked to keep it at bay and contributed to the foundation of the State of Israel.
Fabric with numbers or fabric selvage for house number
The Times has issued a separate report on the subject, which indicates that Nestle may be persuaded to move there.
On Monday night I took to the town! Hog Town! Toronto! Lauren and I, colour coordinated in shiny purple(blueberry tart perhaps?) hit the red carpet at the premiere screening of the CBC television series Mr. D. and Republic of Doyle. How we were lucky enough to get into this exclusive, by invitation only event, is a story on to itself. Let's just say, if you want something badly enough, and expect it will happen, it will. Some call it luck. I think it is magic!
Okay so you think you know what unschooling is all about?
"It's not 'business'," you say? "It's just music, man, don't be such a square." A sharing of cultivated goods and skills for the agreed upon growth and profit of both parties sure as dirt sounds like business to me, say I. Sure, maybe it doesn't have the look, smell or sound of an economic business, but of a creative business it seems to fit the mold neatly.
2 tablespoons ghee
I really do hope you are getting my message, If you want to copy this message to the London EDL Facebook, or any other place, you are free to do so. Because I want the message to be spread!
Of course, there are variations, but basically that's it.
This sign reminded me of the lettering associated with the movie A Christmas Story. Now, let me set the record straight-- I love this movie and it's a tradition for us to watch it--especially when TBS plays it 12 times in a row. Every year I try to recruit my children to be followers as well! My husband, on the other hand, not a fan at all. So this sign was what I bought--I didn't buy the leg lamp--so I'm really doing my hubs a favor!
Anyway, anything as long as it is not bloody tennis.
I know, I know... I'm freakishly obsessed with Wicked. I simply can't help it. Sorry if it bugs you or if you're getting tired of my incessant ranting. But, as promised, here's the scoop on Roberta Valentini.
So out of the total of 12 fish that I bought for the pond this spring - 4 Shubkins, 2 Fantails and 6 gold fish only 6 survived. 1 of the 4 Shubkins survived, 1 Fantail and 4 goldfish survived. Most died within a few days of them coming home except for 2 of the gold fish - they died a couple of months later. So for next spring I now have 10 fish for the pond. I might pick up another Shubkin and Fantail before spring. Oh and all 5 snails that I put into the pond survived and no baby snails that I could see either.
Price: $35
For best texture, let the mousse sit at room temperature for 10 minutes before serving. Serve with very lightly sweetened whipped cream.
Love is a Miracle - Delirious
And silently hummed a prayer
and I stand and watch until at last she hangs like a speck of white cloud
The Doctor Who News Page has reported further condolences from across the Web, mostly Twitter.
I am now 18. God, time goes fast.
This “new” British policy is consistent with the rising nationalism in Europe with anti-immigrant parties having been voted into parliament in the Netherlands and in Sweden in recent times, countries that have prided themselves as “liberal” and “tolerant” societies. Two years ago, the Danish government offered foreigners one hundred thousand krone to leave Denmark. Last year, the French government dangled 300 Euros for every Roma adult and 100 Euros for every Roma child to leave France. France has also banned some forms of Muslim apparel.
"Hardened lava from Indonesia’s Mount Merapi covers ancient temples in the historic city of Yogyakarta," Archaeology News reports. As if fishing in the ground for lost architecture, "Scientists are using remote sensing equipment to locate them."
Those deliberations can now be revealed because Qadir, the retired 30-year veteran of the Pakistani Army, had served for years in South Waziristan alongside Mehsud tribesmen, with whom he had stayed in contact over the years. After the bin Laden raid, Qadir went back to his former comrades, and they introduced him to three of their relatives who had been couriers for Mehsud tribal militant leader Baitullah Mehsud in his contacts with al-Qaeda's second-in-command, Ayman al-Zawahiri, during the 2003 meetings.
Lay Your Hands on Me
Genes can affect complex behaviors like aggression, because they direct the production of proteins – the building blocks of living systems. Certain types of proteins, called enzymes, break down chemicals in the brain, most notably, serotonin – a chemical messenger in the brain that helps brains cells communicate to each other.
“Upheaval, press conferences,” said Paul. “Then time will set us back down so we can clean up the mess and try to pick up where we left off, or as close to that as possible.”
Last, but not least, we cracked open the four different beers that Bill brought along: the Belgian Witbier and Oktorberfest (seasonals) and the two year-round offerings, Stone Mason Stout and Avalanche IPA.
I hope that you all have a great weekend.
You need to try these inks with your papers to find what works for you. Each paper/ink combo will react differently. When you find a combo that works for you, stick with it! It can be tricky switching paper types, particularly for newbies, and frustrating if you choose the wrong ones. For newbies, read what people are saying on this thread. Some combos will keep popping up (Like Gina K. and Memento, or PTI and Memento, or Heat-set brilliance and Neenah), so that's a good place to start for the least frustrating experience.
Non ho mai saputo disegnare, se ho preso la matita in mano negli utlimi anni è stato solo per disegnare qualche crudo schizzo che mi serviva per altro scopo. Non vi dico l’ansia che mi ha presa durante la prima lezione, sono stata per alzarmi e rinunciare. Ma Brunella, serena e sorridente ci incoraggiava ad esercitarsi dicendo che ‘tutto si impara’. Difficile crederle. Ieri pomeriggio mi sono dedicata al disegno, un po’ vergognosa e titubante.
980 D-IX/4(B)/1987. “On Reading the Constitution.” Center for the Study of the Constitution Panel, Annual Convention, American Political Science Association, Palmer House, Chicago, Illinois.
Jack said with a frown,
thanks so much to Angie and Yvonne for having me
Air Race – Vijaypat Singhania, Chairman of the Raymond group became the world’s first International Round the World Air Race champion in 1994.
Having the Lord Ruler as God can be dangerous. Ham raises a valid point about their rebellion. He states that the Lord Ruler “defines what is good.” When the citizens go against his will they are committing not only acts of treason but evil. What if the Lord Ruler is evil himself? Can acts against him still be considered evil? Having a system of rule and religion that is controlled solely by one man, in my opinion is dangerous. What happens if that one person is evil? Or is insane? Who do you turn to? And I have to wonder why the Lord Ruler is destroying other religious beliefs. What is he so afraid of?
If it hadn’t been for the child then none of this might have happened, but the fact that a child was involved made everything that much harder to forgive. Not that there is anything to forgive, of course, but the fact that a child was mixed up in it all made us feel that there was no going back; that it mattered. The fact that a child was affected meant we had to face ourselves properly, we had to follow through.
At Henninger, there's a soda vending machine, flush toilets and a number of campsites. The campground had been closed for quite some time, but it's been open for a while, now. Still, never camped there.
1.) The kind that knocks you out just enough to do nothing but sit on the couch and read or write without feeling guilty.
Submissions must be sent to the UNCCD secretariat by 11:59 pm GMT on 18 May 2012, addressed to:
He stared at the face of his victim and to his horror felt the warmth slowly return in the woman’s body.
Now, when I crave the nicotine rush, the yellow tinge to my fingers, the smoky smell of burnt tobacco, those once fleeting moments of intellectual competence, I chew my drugged up chicklet, bemoan my fate, and blame everyone else.
"He's always playing with them and tries to eat their food if I’m not watching."
While it is not required to use Our Daily Bread Designs images and sentiments on your creations, we would love to see them if you have them! As a way of recognizing those who do use Our Daily Bread Designs stamps, we will again be choosing 1 to 2 creations to spotlight for our Shining the Light Award. In order to qualify for this award, however, you must use Our Daily Bread stamps and have your submission added to Mr. Linky by Friday, April 20th at 8 a.m. EST. If you upload your creations to Splitcoast Stampers or any other online gallery, please use the keyword ODBDSLC104. When creating your posts on blogs please include a link to our challenge.
A guitar reminds you of death and taxes
They are inspired by one of my most favorite teachers online: Beth Newingham. Her site was what initially inspired me to rethink, reorganize, and redo so much of my classroom- if she ever reads this, Beth, you are ah-ma-zing!
Anyone who follows me on twitter knows I am a nut for the Mortal Instruments. Two of the main characters are cast, but the 3rd is not. So, for Simon Lewis, I’d like to see that role go to Logan Lerman.
Seems to be that time of the year when I take stock, when I think a lot about what I'm doing, what I'm wondering, what I am and what I'm becoming and what I want to be.
Broadcast : Jazz Club, France Musique, 27 april 2012
After the pure joy that was Pig's Ear 2009, came the ale free Staff night out, painful being so so so close to Market Porter and Wheatsheaf holy graildom without getting through the door to either. I had to drink vodka. Quite refreshing, actually.
Lee will now play in the final for a third straight year. However, unlike the last two times, when he has had to face the crowd’s overwhelming favourite Taufik Hidayat, this time he is up against Peter Gade (pictured right), who followed up his win over Taufik Thursday by beating the giant-killer Sho Sasaki of Japan 21-11, 21-14 in the other semi-final.
Now that widely reported new allegations say that NotW, under Coulson’s editorship, hacked so many people’s phones (including one belonging to a murdered child, phones belonging to the families of 7/7 bombing victims and the phones of dead soldiers) is it inconceivable that a politician suing the newspaper for slander would also be having his phone hacked?
“He’s also the author and co-editor of seven books and has written over 100 articles and technical journals and book chapters. He founded and continues to serve as the editor of the Asian Journal of Agriculture and Development, an internationally referred journal,” she added.
In a large heavy soup pot, heat a couple tablespoons of olive oil and add the onions. Sprinkle on some salt, stir around and turn the heat to medium. Stir often, till they soften and turn a bit golden. Add the chopped garlic and fry till you can smell it. Stir in the squash chunks, the stock and the can of tomatoes with their juice (if you're using canned tomatillos, add them now). Bring to a boil and simmer for 20 or so minutes, until the squash is very soft. Add the chipotles and the roasted tomatillos, and simmer it all together briefly.
just click on the link for details of how you can enter and whilst you're there you can feast your eyes on some gorgeous inspiration from my fellow teamies.
According to the 2004 Commission to Assess the Threat to the United States of EMP Attack (Executive Report), “Several potential adversaries have or can acquire the capability to attack the United States with a high-altitude nuclear weapon-generated electromagnetic pulse (EMP). A determined adversary can achieve an EMP attack capability without having a high level of sophistication.”
I had a very limited amount of product to use I'm afraid as my trip to
I don't know if this is their idea of contributing to Canada and integrating into Canadian society but it seems like competition and conquest to me.
3/4 cup Unsweetened Coconut Flakes (Optional)
Internal preparation is necessary before we will be mature enough to succeed in really using the opportunities a loving union with another fellow being offers.
Just writing that title makes me feel a bit uneasy.
Even if they only paid 99p for it.
So, here’s what I’d like to see happen:
Even though it was a run, we walked, it was a lot better that way (more color). It was fun to see the different costumes and all of the other people covered in color. My favorite part was defiantly the end, where they had a ‘color-party’ every 15 minutes. The last blast of color, super fun!!!
For if a man is in Christ he becomes a new person altogether—the past is finished and gone, everything has become fresh and new (2 Cor. 5:17-18 J.B. Phillips).
Level 13: Damage: +13%, Critical Rate: +13%.
They will be waiting a long time.
And filled all the stockings; then turned with a jerk,
They took our photos, and gave us ID cards to wear around our necks for the day, which also double as our tickets to Seaworld. The boys were MOST impressed with this little souvenier they received that they didn't have to pay for! (Cause...ya know....I did.)
5. Spirituality: connection to a deeper meaning or reality. In all known cultures, a feeling of personal relatedness with the cosmos appears to have been necessary to mobilize the hopes and energies of the populace. Is this no longer necessary in the 21st century? What new forms might spirituality take?
Then there was the spring of 1965. That March a group of my guy friends began to talk about” jerking off” and how good it felt when you came. We shared the details then one afternoon toward April we gathered in one guys basement for a group instructional session. I was very good at it and learned the technique very quickly.
Puppy
Researchers concluded that several factors affect the longer times for psychiatric patients, including a patient’s alcohol use on the toxicology screening, which delayed the ED stay, as well as restraint use and completing diagnostic imaging, which tacked on time to post-assessment boarding.
That beautiful sunset you wanted to capture, the gorgeous flowers in your garden, the view from some high spot on your last trip...
The Working Party also welcomes the fact that Article 77(2) ensures that the data subject does not bear the burden of addressing the responsible controller in case more than one controller or processor is involved in the processing.
And the study takes for granted a system which divides funds up between various ethnic groups, and it appears that the study's designers thought that the funds should rightfully be split evenly, as that would be 'fair'. Myself, I would think that splitting the funds 'equally' would be more than 'fair'. If money must be doled out to the dependent groups, let it be only in proportion to their numbers. Blacks would get about 12-13 per cent, Hispanics, 15 per cent, and so on. Nobody should get more than their share proportionally, unlike 'affirmative action' and other such systems, which amount to redistributing the goodies to the less successful, from the successful.
Hello and happy wednesday! Seems like the sun finally found her way to our town and I hope she´ll stay for a while. I am really in the summer mood now - and so I made a summer-ish card, sent from the sea, made for the new challenge at Whiff Of Joy. Lace and pearls is what we picked for you this time.
I just can’t get any air.
WSC Matches- 14, Runs- 1415, Avg- 56.60, 100s- 5, High- 246*
and I was just observing
Using needle sew top closed and weave ends.
The first recorded diamond engagement ring was given to Mary of Burgundy by the Archduke Maximillian of Hamburg in 1477. At the time, a diamond was a very rare. It was something only the wealthy would have access to.
Dragon sized monstrosities
As a friend told me, "Even if you don't want to, you have to play the game." Instead of a relationship emerging from two interested people, it's all about catching a boy. An interested girl will have countless anxiety-ridden conversations with her friends about when to text, how to word her texts, what she should do if she passes her boy in the hall. It's stressful and frustrating and insane to get a boy interested in you. Relationships are held together by the thin thread of girls' rumination.
08/12/2010 SELL 0.01 usdcad 1.0487 08/12/2010 1.0449 +3.64
3. Large seedless navel oranges, .37/lb. at H-E-B (through 1/11/11)
In memory of my Mom who would have been 75 today.
I’m rather tempted to stop writing here and see whether any pastors or other readers will answer the question I’ve posed.
Despite all his gigantic flaws, I can't help but to respect the man. While reading the book, I literally find myself getting chills when he's developing a new idea or presenting a theatrical product launch. And what I appreciate the most is that Jobs really knew how to craft artistry in technology. Not only were his products a piece of art (I still remember my first ibook - whatta beaut), but even their packaging & their ads were tasteful with a touch of whimsy. Still one of my favorite ipod commercials:
The copyright-in-silence litigation over John Cage’s composition “4’33”” has long made a great yarn. 4’33” was composed in 1952, contains three movements, and can be played by any instrument. The score simply instructs performers not to play their instrument for the duration of the piece. While it’s often described as a “silence” piece, in reality it consists of ambient noise – the shuffling and whispering and shifting that inevitably occurs when you have a concert hall full of people watching musicians not play their instruments.
***Note to self - turn brain back on! Went to the Robert Sabuda website, to add the link, and discovered all the wonderful pop ups to make. There's even a pop-up Boba Fett!(!!) I'm sure it wasn't all there the last time I looked O_o
Isn't that Happy Birthday Girl just adorable, and I love that polaroid frame ... too cute! I coloured her with Copics of course. They've always been my favourite medium to use. And also because I LOVE glitter, I HAD to add some to that awesome cake. Looks good enough to eat! hehehe. My little sister's birthday is coming up at the end of this month and I had her in mind when I made this card. Not sure if I ever mentioned this but she is 22 years younger than me. Pretty cool eh? Well I think she'll really like the card.
From the top down, he says, public bodies have to accept “the new realities.”
In a large bowl mix together the ginger, lemon juice, pears and the remaining sugar (3 Tbsp.) and a pinch of salt.
Assembly Members James Brennan, Hakeem Jeffries, and Joan Millman, Council Members Letitia James and David Yassky, and 52nd District Leader Jo Anne Simon sent the attached letter to Governor Paterson this past week. The letter explains why these Brooklyn elected officials feel the proposed Atlantic Yards project should not receive funds from the federal stimulus package passed last month.The letter also suggest that people who have send their own letters to Govenor Patterson.
2 strand
Dutch Cream is my favourite potato variety.
Combine raspberry puree, lemon juice, egg yolks, and 1/3 cup sugar in a small saucepan. Place heat on medium and whisk mixture constantly until thickened. Turn off from heat and add butter. Stir until smooth and combined. Pour mixture through sieve and place in fridge to cool.
Anyhow, it wasn’t ground, so Hubs cut it into teeny tiny pieces for me and I browned it that way. I accidentally cooked it too long, because cut up lamb is not the same as ground lamb, but it was fine in the end, albeit the lamb a little tough…ooops. So, if you go this route, I’d sear the lamb (or beef) that isn’t ground, but not fully cook it because later on in the recipe it will cook more. Also, Hubs says when browning or searing meat we want to use high heat so we sear in the flavor...we don't want to boil it.
Some pre-drilling....
Wear a beautiful designer gown.
Stay tuned for the rest of the weekend...
There is always something for which to be thankful. Today I’m thankful for a sunny day. Yes, the sun is shining and the temperature is about 9 degrees Celsius (or 48 degrees Fahrenheit). It’s a nice change from our snowy and cold weekend.
Geranium sanguineum ‘Max Frei’ – A very compact form of Bloody Cranesbill with bright magenta-pink flowers from May to June, with sporadic blooms for the rest of summer. ‘Max Frei’ makes a good groundcover and tolerates part to full sun, although in shade it grows taller and produces fewer flowers. This compact Cranesbill grows 6-9″ high. Hardy to zone 3.
–knowing that I will be back.
Over the next three days, I developed migraines, a lung infection, a sore throat and a cough. My brain felt thick and I could barely form a coherent sentence, let alone shift into good feeling thoughts. When I could think, my thoughts were along the lines of: I am sick; it feels like I have a viral infection in my lungs; I am so tired; there’s no way I can get through a day of work; I just need to rest and let this run it’s course. I tried to shift my thoughts, but my reality was so real!
And here is Mona the Flapper. An old vintage b/w photo, coloured by yours truly and Mona is wearing a little make-up......and she has eyebrows! I think she looks quite fetching in that hat, what do you think?
I guess we're all just busy at the moment. Or, the sad-sack part of me wonders, is it something more? Is it perhaps people are just not into my blog anymore? If so, that's my fault, for not putting up substantive posts. At least, that's a possibility.
The protest action was also prevalent, in the two terms that he served, as vice-president of the international Reformed Ecumenical Synod. In 1980 he staged a boycott of participation where the white Dutch Reformed Church, supporting apartheid, participated.
But there was one night that beat all the others. The one that would make me abandon my half-built snowman without even being called. At least not by a human. No, it was the aroma of Garlic bread, tomato sauce and Italian sausage that literally wafted through the walls and into the chilly air to tell me exactly what night it was. Lasagna night.
Entre Nous directed by Diane Kurys
Food: Burgers and fries
It's our aunt & uncles 50th wedding anniversary December 1st; could I come to the party on the 3rd?
I Spent many years backpacking around the world with very small amount of money in my pocket, sleeping in boats, trains and youth hostels. I’ve seen much surely Not yet all. I Spent those years writing letters and sharing experience with my friends that nurture a true and passionate love for anthropology.
Dear Heavenly Father, I pray that Your Word will grow mightily and prevail in the life of every child born into the body of Christ. I ask that you grant the parents the wisdom they required to train up their children in the nurture and admonition of The Lord, such that they’ll be influenced by Your Word and established upon the truth of the gospel, in Jesus Christ Name. Amen!
Finally, we decided the woman pertains to the city, and the son to the Temple. The Temple gets destroyed. Ezra’s eschatological promise is for the restoration of both, as Zion is a wasteland without the life-source of the sacrifices of the Temple. The imagery of the land as barren for 3000 years without sacrifice is touching.
8:00 – Golden Triangle, The Fresh & Onlys, The Babies @ MONSTER ISLAND BASEMENT $8
That’s despite the fact that Google itself admitted it turned to “U.S. authorities,” which obviously includes the NSA, after the search giant’s Chinese operation was deeply hacked. Former NSA chief Mike McConnell told the Washington Post that collaboration between the NSA and private companies like Google was “inevitable.”
Jesus Christ means you’re standing in the place of Our Lord Jesus Christ;
Beauty's not dead and neither am I.
-To enter, either post this giveaway's URL on tumblr, Blogger, Twitter or Facebook:
Goo: Well, at first, as I swore under oath I was only able to grunt. I had disgusting grunting down to a science. No pun intended to the crazy fundies…I grunted for 200 billion years without a break. Finally after a billion years of grunting I was so tired of the sound that I thought somethings gotta give….This was when I was a disgusting, sweaty, smelly, ignorant, hairy, incredibly ugly, sex-crazed beast. But for no apparent reason thanks to the time-god, my language became more complex as my vocal tract evolved along with my tongue and larynx.
Here is my photographic essay of sleepy time at the Zoo, of pictures I took before my nap.
Lowering Earth’s reflectivity by reducing cloud cover doesn’t work. Models also show that a greenhouse effect from dense carbon dioxide and methane can’t warm the Earth enough either. In some simulations, methane and carbon dioxide combine to make a photochemical smog that would have chilled Earth even further.
1) Hudson. Pure genius.
Is the Christian life one of ease? Is it a bed of roses that has been promised us? If it is so why does the Word of God tell us in 2 Timothy 2:3 to “endure hardness as a good soldier of Jesus Christ”? In 2 Timothy 3:12 we have the assurance that “all that will live godly in Christ Jesus shall suffer persecution.” It may well be at the hands of man or more specifically, the work of Satan as was the case here with Paul and his travelling companions.
It’s important to remember that evolution doesn’t mean that we’re different than other animals – it just means we’re the latest model… the ‘upgrade’. All that old programming is still a part of us, whether we’re comfortable with that fact or not – (just look at a fetus in the womb… or any bar filled with people who’ve had to much to drink)! So what does this all add up to? I propose that perhaps porn is so interesting, to so many of us, because it taps into that primal, pack, tribal part of us that has not been left behind simply because of our modern choice of housing. And if that’s the case, then it’s natural for us to be interested in seeing and hearing others have sex.
DOWNLOAD YOUR FREE ACHERON LIVE CD RIGHT HERE!
Cast Iron Baths – Design a Durable Bathroom
You all know how much I love Dude Time Doodles digis and making masculine cards (part of the requirement for DTD cards.) This week, the challenge at Dude Time is to use the freebie they offer to make a card or project, and a win means you could be the next guest designer for a month. Here's what I did for the challenge.
Sitges is an old fishermen town where gathered the bohemian artists of the first generation of the Catalan Modernist Movement, and where also built their houses the immigrants that came back rich from America. More about this site here.
M-girl started whining to express her annoyance at having to write those four extra letters. This began to bother D-boy who had been busily working with his math box. He approached M-girl (who was still in mid-whine) and told her, "You are starting to make me angry, so you'd better stop!"
The lawyer confirmed he had abandoned claims of sodomy against Terre'Blanche, despite having earlier alleged that Mahlangu had been sexually assaulted.
First off, in our family, no one is big on celebrations. We don’t really celebrate anything that is traditionally being celebrated. With that being said, last week was my birthday, April 27th. And with the opening sentence, you should already know that I treated the day as “business as usual” day.
Sucking my balls then going back to sucking and jerking
Now I hunted and could not find what I was looking for. This picture doesn't really show what I was trying to show. He was petrified of her. Screaming bloody murder if she looked at him, petrified of her. This went on for several months. And in hindsight was kinda funny. At the time it made our playdates interesting.
We love the idea that a man can take the fruits of his labor, create a business and offer a superior product or service and become wealthy, thus allowing him to live without the worries of being able to provide for those he loves. We also love being able to provide for those we love. We love not being dependent upon a government check or program. We love succeeding on our own merit and abilities, without having some program give us something we haven't earned based upon the color of our skin, where we were born or who we love. We love the idea of true equality, where each have what they have earned, not what was stolen for them in the name of compassion. We love compassion. We love the idea of allowing people to earn their own way, reaping rewards or suffering consequences for their choices, thus teaching down through the generations the better choices which lead to success instead of the worse choices which lead to failure.
We can get really technical with our definition of karma, but I'll just say it's action. I'll take a superstitious leap and say it's a little magic, too. I think I carry my fair share of both; my mother comes from a Sicilian mafia family and my dad escaped his upbringing by joining the Marines. Then my parents split and I "served myself" as my mother put it, meaning, she put frozen food in the fridge and I'd eat it. I moved out when I was 17, drank way too much, found Zen when I was 20, and things got much worse before they got better, I found a sangha, I found fellowship in the rooms, and I have a therapist.
artichokes
Finally a National Animal card of New Zealand featuring the most fierce and dangerous animal ever... the Sheep.
Puree of red peppers and shrimp paste. Add water, then boiled with brown sugar and vinegar and salt to boiling. Cool.
Participation in this study will contribute to the understanding of the satisfaction of parents in their decision making to enroll their child in Kindergarten when they did. If you are the parent of a child who is 18-35 years of age, with a birthday that falls anywhere between June 1st and October 1st, and would be interested in completing a survey regarding the research question stated above, please reply to:
The key component to Women for Women's program is their Sponsorship Program wherein women are sponsored by other women. This provides the women in the program to be provided with basic survival needs (food, water, etc) while they are getting back on their feet. Once they are in a stabilized environment they can then move on to the next phase of the program which is learning life skills -- technical and vocational skills, leadership education and rights awareness. The organization also offers more advanced business services for the time when the women are ready to become more independent. They offer micro-lending and many other business fostering services.
The four high-speed jets landed at RAF Northolt in west London ahead of a major military exercise to test security for London 2012. It is the first time fighter aircraft have been stationed at the base since the Second World War.
Studying thermal images, researchers found that the digit was colder than the others but warmed by up to 6C during foraging.
First, I took a pillow that I wasn't using, took the pillow out and used the fabric as my pattern. I cut out two pieces of my new fabric
9. You identify aspects of your professional life, where you could be stern enough to criticize yourself, and lay down and enjoy the sun. You extend the concept to each one of your team-mates as well.
"Do you think you're on track?"
Economics is a part of our everyday lives. Because the state of the economy plays such a central role in our local, state and national politics, people should be aware of how the economy is doing and what effect government’s policies have on the economy. While the responsibility of making economic policy belongs to national and world leaders, we need to understand how their decisions can affectWisconsin’s economy.
In 2001 Elon College (the school) became Elon University; Elon College (the town) became Elon; and the football program got a new stadium. The year before, Elon had changed the nickname of its athletic teams from the “Fightin’ Christians” to the “Phoenix”. (Kind of a boring nickname, if you ask me.) Elon had completed its transition from the NAIA to NCAA Division I in 1999.
I’m so excited.
The bartender starts to pull a rifle and Smith grabs his pistol and throws it upside the barkeep's head. Hex holds a pistol to the local's head until the boots are clean, then Hex asks Smith why he threw the pistol. Smith says he had a better chance of hitting what he was aiming at. Hex runs the locals off and he and Smith stay in the saloon most of the night.
Wait a little minute, I said to myself, after writing that. The enjoyment of praise is only one motive for the WIW post.
The hotel itself is really impressive, with a central hallway that runs the entire length of the hotel.
On some days your neighbor,
Marie has been doing the Slim Fast diet for quite a while and has noticed a difference in her weight loss; she’s also going to be starting Fit Bit soon, due to my recommendation. I figured the Slim Fast diet would also help me to stick to my Fit Bit calories, which I am struggling to do at the moment. A Slim Fast milkshake is around 200 calories, which is nothing really, when you think that a chocolate bar is around the same. When I did the Slim Fast diet last time, I did find that I filled up on those bad boys too, so it’s worth a try, right?
Last night I had another one of those almost "too real" dreams - the kind where everything seems real to the point where you "know" it was more than just a dream, even though all logic and reason tell you that dreams are just dreams.
How far along? 8 Weeks
So, to any and all of you who may chance upon this post---"Christ bless your home and all who dwell within."
and prayerfully. It is given in life, will be
While lutein is not considered an essential nutrient, studies suggest that it may play an important role in maintaining healthy vision and preventing eye diseases such as age-related macular degeneration (ARMD) and cataracts. Getting adequate amounts of this carotenoid may also decrease the risk of developing colon cancer and heart disease.
My heart needs this light, this wildness, this restoration from a kind of soul-sickness; needs the absence of electronics (OK I did have to find wifi access for this!), of mobile signal, of landline, of domestic routines and agendas: it's a kind of 'defragging' of my 'desktop' (I can't believe I've just used that analogy). And this place, eco-farm, conservation area, refuge for sanity and values I can relate to, has become a stillpoint for me over the last decade; a kind of home, the owners now friends.
Being ill for a couple of days had one advantage: it allowed me to catch up with Season One of Game of Thrones. Ho. Lee. Crap. That is my new favorite show. We didn't have HBO when it first aired, and we won't have it anymore starting about halfway through this current season (we have a free trial right now because of our recent switch to DirecTV)(which I still HATE), but I will enjoy it while I can. P is reading the first book now, so shhhh! No one tell him anything! He doesn't know about Ned yet! Or Viserys, even! Also, I'd like to take this opportunity to go on record as having been a huge Peter Dinklage fan since WAY before this series started. Hello, 13 Moons, anyone? Am I the only one who saw that movie? Probably so. Anyway, I have dibs on the Dinklage, is what I'm saying.
Looking forward to answering your questions! (And getting my mind off the waiting!)
I know it's been awhile since I've posted. I just haven't had much to post about lately. I've been lazy and haven't done much in the way of sewing. I even fell behind on a few swaps I joined and that is so not like me at all. I figured I needed to take a break when I couldn't keep up with swaps and it was only 2 of them so it was nothing overwhelming even.
Per il fiore ho usato una die Whiff of Joy, ho tagliato 4 pezzi in due misure, li ho accartocciati, li ho riaperti e infine distressati con il Black Soot. Una brad con la perla nel messo completa il tutto.
All the spirits marvelled at what stood before them. With one great flash of light they came before the Rainbow Serpent and found him pulsating with magnificent colour. The spirits were told to go into the world and to create beautiful living things, animals, birds, trees and fish.
Skátar
And forgive me for being an old crusty reactionary, but don't Canadians already have the tools, as it were, to succeed?
Been Training Dogs
NOT me!
I had just expressed a desire for more better mediumship with more verbal communication, but my experience of this exercise could hardly have been more opposite to my request. The guides which revealed themselves weren’t even persons in any sense. The first impression I received was of an evergreen tree, not a realistic image but more like a green paper cutout. There was a deep green all over my inner field of vision. I asked for a message, and it seemed to be, “Keep growing.”
1 mollusc
Agent: Newley?
The lamp and book on the top of the shelf use to be on the entertainment center in the family room. I have this pretty covered dish for years. I can not use it for food as it has been repaired. It is just so pretty, I wanted to display it openly.
Reasons why I didn’t like it:
So that's my list! Do you agree or disagree with my choices? I'm excited for this series and all the eye candy it promises to bring. I think we'll learn a lot about the bloggers by discovering their crushes, and maybe find a new one for ourselves! Who would make your Marry, Make Out & Muzzle list? I'll miss you, lovebugs, but will return soon with Trip Reports! And look for the ah-maze-ing giveaway coming up next week, too!
Bake at 350 degrees for 45 minutes. Let sit for 10 minutes before serving to allow it to set.
I took this picture of Mallam junction, en route to the Accra-Cape Coast highway. The above picture shows the beginning of the BRT. I write beginning specifically because there was a signboard on the road where you see the buses indicating that it is only for "dropping". Sadly, I saw private cars (including a diplomatic-licensed car) using that route--most likely to avoid traffic. Once it is in shape, this part of Accra is likely to reduce traffic considerably.
‘‘(A) the use of such information is not for a regulatory purpose; and
This calculation demonstrates that the seventieth week of Daniel cannot begin on December 21, 2012 because it would be at odds with the designation of when the End Times will end after adding 2520 days from the start of the seventieth week of Daniel.
This is David Hendry 1914 - 1944
75018 Paris
"Can you come around the back, I've been robbed", I yelled.
Gives me d.t.’s and da willies.
So, this is what I’ll be doing if anyone needs to find me:
I am a bit bothered by something, actually a bit more than "bit" but not in a huge, dramatic way. I'm not angry. I think I am a bit puzzled, feelings might be a little hurt, I know I can say I am "irritated".
(Jacqueline Bouvier was descended from a cabinet maker named Michel Bouvier, who fought in Napoleon’s army and emigrated to Philadelphia during the White Terror, where he established himself by making furniture for Joseph Bonaparte, also in exile. So there is a nice connection between this letter and Jackie Bouvier’s French roots.)
Dr. Talos, that mad scientist whose skills have managed to create simulacra of life, beauty, and truth. The composer of that play near the end which serves to foreshadow the concluding two volumes of Severian's saga. The fox-like creature, so clever and so manipulative, the apparent source of so much subterfuge. I have read elsewhere that some have postulated that Talos is based on the mythological Cretan creature of bronze that guarded the island, while others have noted his role as artificer as being but an extension of this attempt to replicate life via mechanical means. I side more with this second explanation, as Talos (and by extension, Baldanders) seem at first to have goals so similar to the more mystical bringing of the New Sun (or the second blooming of life on Urth), but whose means betray their real end goals.
I would have liked to say this was the end of our weekend, but we went to see the Tintin movie, which according to the children was a perfect end to our weekend...
The impact of the system is that I score writing technique (35 possible points) higher than the underlying story (10 possible points). This weighting means that a decent story expertly written is going to place higher than a great story with writing problems.
Counselor, Giver of an eternal life whose wonders we cannot imagine.
And holds clues so that
The whole carriage could see his style
What did he see when he cut the cocoon? He saw that the caterpillar was actually developing wings to become a butterfly. And because he had cut the cocoon before time, the wings of the caterpillar were very weak. They did not have the strength to handle the weight of the caterpillar and so the caterpillar could not fly.
I’m dreaming of my next visit.
Now this may seem ridiculously obvious to some of you.
Hopefully there are still some Mythik Readers out there ;) So here's the deal: April has slipped away in the blink of an eye, just like March did, because my schedule has been extremely busy. I did finish a screenplay for a paranormal thriller and have been doing multiple re-writes. Writing for the silver screen is a bit different than writing a novel, of course. The rewrites aren't just for plot or characterization, but also fall along the lines of "our special effects department needs more info to make the blank" or "we can't afford to do that" etc. But it is definitely fun.
Time and distance
Sometimes, you really tend to forget what you have. You neglect to appreciate even simple blessings you receive. Instead, you look for something you don’t have, until you realize that you lose what you used to have and because you never understood it’s true value. You keep on looking for another stones when you already have diamonds in your hands. You are never happy, because you are not contented.
Started out of a dorm room, now worth about 75 billion dollars.
Imagine that you are a Japanese teenage girl with your legs cut off by a vampire and somehow through the genius of your father the vice-principal, your severed legs are mounted to the vertex of your skull where they spin like helicopter blades to propel you through space over the campus.
She said the family smiled when she told them that the “angel” who paid down their account was a 10-year-old boy.
The literal translation from the French (according to our French-English dictionary) is "How Things Are Done," but that doesn't begin to describe it.
Gladys sucked in a deep breath and tried again. The little car’s engine revved as she gave it all the gas she could as she tried to ease out on the clutch and move on over the bridge, but the water kept distracting her causing her to pop the clutch and die. Finally she caught the gear and moved on up the bridge to begin the descent into Coronado just in time to hear on the radio that a stalled car on the Coronado Bridge had caused a traffic jam all the way up the 5 freeway.
43. Scotland has spawned some of the greatest thinkers of the modern age, including Adam Smith, James Watt, David Hume and John Stuart Mill.
On the other hand, there are several of their beers that leave me cold. The Leinenkugel's Original is unpleasant to me. Strangely, this is the beer that they used to establish themselves, but I find it over-hopped and a little strange. The Berry Weiss is basically a chick beer, lotsa berry and only sorta-kinda beery. And their Sunset Wheat tastes to me like a blueberry PopTart. Blech.
Even so it's scary, you get one chance at getting it right, so you have to get yourself into a state of mind that is both totally in concentration and simultaneously also in a trance to paint. Good music helps, ambient music that allows you to drift away.
Two separate revegetation plans were completed fall 2011 as an addition to the large-scale Ruby Pipeline Right of Way Restoration. The East Fork of the Little Bear River Wildlife Management Area, located approximately 2 miles east of Avon, UT, was comprised of three different vegetation types: riparian/wetland shrub, meadow, and woodland.
Leaving work, Mi Roo gets a “sock on the doorknob” text from Tan Ya asking her to go home to mom. Mi Roo wants to know who the guy is and Tan Ya’s not one to kiss and tell just yet. It’s just that he’s such a sound sleeper that she doesn’t have the heart to kick him out.
My personalities are in a constant battle with each other but one thing is for sure, If i don’t find an anchor soon, this ship will surely set sail…
A spokesman for the International Security Assistance Force (ISAF) under NATO told AFP: “It was an ISAF airstrike.”
Yesterday was a throw the windows open sorta day. It was sunny and warm. A little guy in our home spent most of the day outside building gnome homes, playing in the mud and aspiring to make progress with his scooter on the still soggy ground. At one point he had short sleeves on. His cheeks revealed a bit of pink left over from all that sunshine.
“At heart I always see myself as a campaigner. For a year or more, the main thing I was doing was sitting in my room obsessing over every last sentence: is this phrased in the right way, is the spirit of this right, is this said as well as I can say it? But I started writing the book after climate camp last year and finished it sitting at the base of Nelson’s Column on the day of the anti-cuts march. I saw the book a continuation of the work I do in grassroots training and empowering. I have lost count of the number of workshops I have run since the book came out, but it’s definitely broken the forty mark.”
A few minutes later, a guy with a friendly smile and extensive sleeve art came out of the back and asked me what I thinking about.
This is what I know and also what I keep forgetting and so need to practice! Why do I keep forgetting? How do I keep allowing my… well, what the Buddhist call kleshas to affect me. What are kleshas? Essentially we could say emotions or one definition is “mental states that cloud the mind and manifest in unwholesome action”. In the modern-day world we often hear them called “emotional patterns”. Your patterns! Right? Your customary and habitual emotional responses. Yeah, new ager’s want to deny those or push them away and not deal with them out in the open like this. Here’s what I was writing about in the last blog about my “muggle” klesha. This is from the writing of Lama Zopa Rinposhe; it is expressing what I wrote about–remembering the nature of emptiness and calling upon the praja/wisdom of the prajnaparamita (emptiness). Let’s go right to Rinposhe’s words:
These chippy heirloom frames, $129 for a set of 3, have been done time and time again, but they still get me. What a great empty frame display, and use of "old" items in new spaces. Love that texture.
At the time of construction of this reactor vessel, the ASME codes did not cover reactor pressure vessels; this code was added later. Further information of interest on fabricating the vessel comes from the same book:
On the basis of his own presuppositions, the atheist completely cancels himself out, for on his own premises his arguments are without any absolute validity. By his own confession he thinks the way he does simply because the atoms in his brain happen to combine the way they do. If this is so, he cannot honestly say that his view is any more valid than the contrary view of his opponent. His basic postulates are self-contradictory and self-defeating; for when he asserts that there are no absolutes, he thereby is asserting a very dogmatic absolute. Nor can he logically disprove the existence of God without resorting to a logic that depends on the existence of God for its validity. Apart from such a transcendent guarantor of the validity of logic, any attempts at logic or argumentation are simply manifestations of the behavior of the collocation of molecules that make up the thinker’s brain. — Gleason Archer, Encyclopedia of Bible Difficulties, pp. 55-56
The BPAI held its first set of hearings this afternoon in the new Electronic Hearing Room while the appellants participated electronically from Chicago. The electronic hearing room allows for an oral hearing in an ex parte appeal or inter partes case from remote locations anywhere in the world. While three administrative patent or trademark judges preside from the USPTO in Alexandria, Va., an attorney can present a client's case from anywhere around the globe with equipment capable of dialing Standard - H.320 (ISDN) protocol.
The Ofcom report also highlighted a very encouraging trend, which combined with the increase in volunteers, perhaps gives a reason why the community radio service is growing. The average number of hours worked by volunteers has increased by 82 hours in the last year.
SNACKEN R, SZUCS TD (Eds.). The socioeconomics of influenza and its control measures. Pharmacoeconomics 1999; 16 (Suppl. 1): 1-100.
For the past couple of weeks, my Sunday Birthday Goal Updates have been the same – the scale is stuck, because while my food is on point, I’ve been seriously lagging with my workouts. I’m really not sure what the problem is, other than the fact that I haven’t been pushing myself hard enough. I haven’t kept my eye on the prize. And I’ve been giving in the lots of excuses – “I’m tired.” “The AC in my classroom has been out and it’s warmer in there than outside.” “I’ll go tomorrow.” It’s become endless, so much so that I’m boring myself.
First of all, understand that separation of tweet and sale. The tweet's sole purpose is to get the reader to click through to the book page. Stop. That's all the tweet is supposed to do. You cannot sell a book from a tweet anymore than you can get hired from a resume. Or it's rare. Focus your tweets on getting a click to the book page and focus your book page on getting the sale. Don't try to skip steps.
Again, I really didn't consider it any sort of warning sign or anything like that. We women are tough and used to our bodies having unusual discharges. All women go through menopause differently and there are no set rules. Who knows why our bodies do what they do, right?
1 melted
Falconer Session Bitter will also benefit from a larger malt bill, to add a bit more body, and make it even tastier!
twill knot
"Some men who are wiccans are reclaiming the name "warlock" in the tradition of women reclaiming the name "witch". Warlock is commonly said to mean oath breaker. What do you think? Can it/should it be reclaimed?"
Tim emailed Dunollie in advance, the usual – I am a MacDougall, coming on these dates, can I come visit, oh and my partner is a trained archivist who would be interested in some volunteer work. What they read was “blah, blah, blah, archivist, blah, blah”. So when we went in today with “Hi, I’m Tim and this is Bronwyn, we emailed ahead” we got, oh the archivist, come have a cup of tea. We had a tour of the archive, a description of the work I will be doing squeel, a brief staff meeting about the future of the archive, a talk about some of the fascinating work they have done and the visit of the national archives. Eventually someone asked if either of us had Scottish roots. I replied with “well I don’t but Tim is an Macdougall”…opps, were they surprised and a bit embarrassed. Despite the fact the emails have been printed out and placed into their records (I’m in a Corporate Record, oh the permanancy) no one had read any more than ACHIVIST, they had not even noticed Tim’s last name.
Amy and I didn’t really get a chance to celebrate Valentine’s Day on Valentine’s Day. We went to lunch for my birthday, but I never had a chance to make her a really spectacular dinner that night. I told her that she should figure out what she wants, and I would make it for her. She decided that she wanted cheese ravioli. I never really liked cheese ravioli, so I asked Mario Batali(via Twitter) what would be the best blend of cheeses. He replied, potato, ricotta, and parmesan. Who am I to argue with Mario Batali?First I made the filling:
But anyway, I could go on in an indignant fashion, but that would be pointless. There are a lot of bloggers out there feeling a bit vulnerable, though some have suggested some fightback action. Matthew Song, By Toad is writing to a Columbia bigwig, which should be interesting. But ultimately there's probably not much we can do against heavy handed, idiotic people who have money and legal power on their side. Actually, there are a couple of things I can to to mitigate things a bit.
Gloves
Religion desires the view from the heights also, ostensibly to position its sacred space as close to possible to the god on high. But this remains a situation of power – the view over the people and the land, the dominion enjoyed from above, the call to the faithful who look up to the exalted ones, cloistered or otherwise, a conduit to their highest hopes and dreams. Doubtless this position is often filled with sincerity; but it can also be seen as part of the history of assuming cultural authority over people and land, a new kind of force to either replace or augment the military and its arms. This can be seen when churches are built over pagan sites of ritual or consecration, as well as when they work hand in glove with a monarchy or other form of ruling elite.
My husband is squarely in the eye-for-an-eye camp. If someone had done to him what was done to Amanda, I could totally see him spending the rest of his life making those people pay. I grew up in a dysfunctional, abusive household. I was an angry teen. By the time I was an adult, I learned I had to let it go. The anger and hate would just eat away at me and ruin more of my life. So although I carry that baggage with me and it has formed who I am, it doesn’t rule my life. Amanda’s rage rules hers.
I started off going slow, and watched the rearview mirror to make sure he wasn't falling or anything. We we the only house on this backstreet, so I wasn't worried about cars coming, but I was worried about his gangly ass breaking his neck. He tapped the trunk of the car, so I went a little faster. Almost five miles an hour. He then hit the trunk again, and I checked to make sure he was serious. He was. He gave me a thumbs up, with his big goofy smile on his face. I sped up. Seven to eight miles an hour, and he was still holding on. I was laughing by this time, because seriously- who would have thought he'd last?
Our second at 11dp5dt was 1189
Keep this in mind: everyone is welcome to attend at any time. Astrology is a complex study. We touched on a lot last night, and will go over all of it again. Each week, we’ll spend time focused on a particular aspect and yet still be taking in the big picture.
Brilliant. You don’t see too many scholastic articles cracking cheap puns. It’s a good thing I am not a scientist, because I would be taking advantage of that untapped market. Cancer? More like cantcer. Hypercholesteremia? More like hypercholessteremia. Bowel disease? Uh, more like bowel diseasy to cure with curecumin. God I’m good.
I feel like he’s looking at me like this little girl, and I’m not. I feel he’s also looking at me like this mystery. Which is great, lets keep the mystery alive. But I have a mind…I have this body. I know what I want, I know what I feel. In my head, it tells me “You know you’re ready!” But honestly, my heart says differently. It says, “Imani, not yet. You’re still quite scared, and it’ll show.” I choose to believe my heart. It doesn’t lie, for the truth comes out of it every time.
Anyway it smells lovely and I now smell lovelier!
Not really something new now, but I just wanted to show you what I did with this set. I was looking for a way to store all the loose figures I paint, so I decided to base them. They are not ment for wargaming but it looked nice this way.
Here are ten of my goals that I can share with you all.
Certainly “Psycho” looks more like early 1960s television than any of the more sumptuous fare Hitchcock had been bringing to screen at the time. Not only is it in black-and-white, not color, but the sets; a ramshackle motel, a mothbally old house, a couple of cheap looking bedrooms, a bathroom in a used-car dealership, are deliberately low class.It’s thrilling to see Hitchcock move so effectively outside his normal element, and move things along with such clinical detachment and low-key technical finesse. Thrilling, too, to realize this is one of his most accomplished products; made by a man who was experienced enough to know how the game was played, and daring enough still to break the rules; indeed, start a whole new ballgame.Is it the best Hitchcock movie? It’s definitely one of his best, right up there with “The 39 Steps” and “Strangers On A Train” and “Sabotage” and “Shadow Of A Doubt.” He only once again came close to making as good a film, with “The Birds,” while Janet Leigh and Anthony Perkins never escaped the greatness they helped create here. Poor John Gavin had to quit the biz entirely, and became an ambassador.Often imitated, parodied, referenced, and analyzed to death, “Psycho” still isn’t played out nearly 53 years after it came out. You owe it to yourself to pay a visit to the Bates Motel; Norman has a room ready.
PT: Looking to the future, how do you envisage executive coaching fitting in within the ever-connected world that EFactor members enjoy?
Daniel 8:6
Deputy Registrar of Titles
One of their stupid regulations for being able to send the packet back is that you should control it for damage when it is delivered. So you should open it in presence of the postman and check every product in the pack if it is not damaged or working properly. can you imagine if every deliverer should have to wait by every customer until he or she has checked the whole packet?
they should chant SMOKEY THE BEAR’S WAR CHANT:
Judy’s success has led to a busy few years with many projects and exhibitions to organise, as well as keeping her business ticking over. But why is she doing everything on her own? She could have interns but she said but it’s hard to know whether there what she’s looking for or even whether they’ll get on. She’s really not keen on working alongside other fashion designers either because when they’re using the same inspirations they can start to come up with very similar ideas and Judy loves her creations to be unique.
Tim Holtz Butterfly Border Die
What the hell am I wearing today?
With her head there
Summer heat is finally coming to an end. 2011 went down in the records books as one of the hottest. Many are looking forward to the cooler weather of fall and time to focus on outdoor projects. Designing a new landscape for a nice relaxing place after a long day is a project better undertaken in the fall here in Phoenix.
Latin America's novel-writing boom by delving into the failed ideals of the Mexican revolution, died Tuesday in a Mexico City hospital. He was 83. Mexico's National Council for Culture for the Arts confirmed the death of Mexico's most celebrated novelist. The cause was not immediately known, said the culture official, who was not authorized to speak to the media. Mexican media reported Fuentes died at the Angeles del Pedregal hospital, where he was being treated for heart problems. The loss was immediately mourned worldwide via Twitter and across Mexican airwaves. A message on President Felipe Calderon's Twitter account said "I deeply lament the death of our
In fact, according to the FAO “A number of insect species are considered to be an exquisite meal, such as barbecued palm weevil larvae or roasted termites.”
One of the reasons I see people give for not starting a blog is not knowing what to write about. We’ve all been there, trust me. I thought it’d be fun to challenge our new (and experienced!) bloggers with some ideas–prompts, sort of–to keep the first month of content rolling.
9. Saint Louis Billikens
one indicating right to pull out
Because this is worthy copy
The blogger awards are nice too. I appreciate the ones I’ve received, but it got a bit silly for a while - there were a few that seemed to be going around given with instructions to pass to 4587 other people. Great. But then I realised that if everyone had one they lost their value.
David F: What’s your favorite Nerd candy flavor?
Just over a year ago I signed up for an evening course in Writing for Children at City University. I mentioned it to someone the other day and her lip curled. ‘I’m not sure how worthwhile these courses are,’ she said. ‘After all JK Rowling never did a course in writing for children, did she?’
2 join
Self-trackers recently gathered at Stanford University, in California, for a seminar titled “The Uploaded Life: Personal evaluation through self tracking.” Over snacks and cold drinks, participants could also test out the latest measuring devices.
Canada seems to have a great deal of time and money to spend spying on our people and keeping us in poverty. Since I will no doubt be labled a "radical", I guess there is no harm in sharing some of my radical ideas: why don't we put that extra money into providing lawyers for those granted standing at the murdered and missing Aboriginal women inquiry? Or perhaps invest some in First Nations schools to close the education gap? Or, even more radical, why don't we provide equitable funding for child and family services, housing, water, and sewer on reserve...
“I do not like this asparagus!! It’s in the shape of an X!!”
7 56 16.43 S , 14 22 33.81 W
soaked from water overflowing
And actually the most impressive garden on the grounds is the one Michelle Obama planted on the south part of the property looking toward the Washington Monument. That’s growing very nicely, and will keep the first family in veggies through the season.
Before anyone accuses me of being anti-Swiss, let me say that I have every respect for the concept of a Swiss-themed brothel. Buxom milkmaids, cuckoo clocks and girls called Heidi are the dog’s bollocks for a certain type of punter. I’m sure a bordello like that would rake in the cash in Rio or Acapulco. The point is that you need to have a party atmosphere to encourage hanky-panky, and the Swiss are not party animals. Theirs is an alpine lifestyle, where cold showers and yodelling on the hillside take precedence over socialising with other humans.
Giving advice
Next, is with the Worker Party. One of their MP was caught with some misdeed. He was keeping quite after accusation fall heavily against him. He chose not to reply at all to all accusation. I think he does not know what to do. Soon he does not even attend meetings of the party and was then dismissed. Eventually, the WP started the repair job, he was terminated. I think the WP repair team was pretty swift; the repair was done quick and good, in the end they found that their machine was again running. So WP put forwarded to the people of the terminated MP constituency telling them, hey, my machine is working now. It is the government that do not want to run the machine. So, the people waited for the by election.
with 2 runners up each receiving a free graphic....and of course your winner's badges for your blog...x
This is a great story that tells of the love and devotion it takes to help save a turtle's nest. Britt and Bella don't give up on their quest, even when people wanted to set up a volleyball net on top of or near the nest. The girls knew what was right and were determined to help save the nest and the eggs, and for their reward saw many turtles make their way back to the sea. This story brings great messages for children around the world who want to do their share to help save the animals. The back of the book also contains more information about turtles. Children between the ages of 6-9 will enjoy this 25 page picture book about friendship and courage, and will also enjoy the other book in the series as well, which also talks about the beach. Children who live on the beach, or visit one, will look at it's beauty differently and will get a better understanding of it's importance.
Cardamom powder- a little less than 1/4 tsp or to taste (powder the seeds alone from about 5-6 pods)
Ninety minutes pass, and virtually all over cases are handled and finished. During this time the tenant and rep talk about a possible deal. The landlord seems to going a bit crazy, letting her poor rep show up so unprepared. Morial really doesn’t like the landlord’s policy of large cash pick ups of rent, and suggests checks and money orders as a necessary alternative. Turns out this is an absentee landlord who spends most of the time in New Jersey. Good reason, their reputation in the Crescent City is in tatters, even WWL-TV did a expose of their real estate business. Here’s a link to the story.
That's exactly what happened to Jack Cole in November, 1953 when the Ladies Home Journal, a very well-read magazine of the time, published an anti-comics article and called attention to his work.
Last year, I was in Lehigh University for 3 months as a visiting researcher. I experienced two natural disasters; the Virginia earthquake and hurricane Irene. Even though the Lehigh area was affected, it was small. To tell you the truth, I was scared but at the same time I was excited. It was my first experience.
~ Cousins, Cousins, Cousins!! ~
Some people think race plays a role in the way people act and behave. Anyone remember Timothy Mcvee? He was a white man who blew up a building and killed 100′s of people. He was not brown-skinned, he spoke the same language as anyone else in America. Why did he act like that? The stereo type of good behaving humans are to be white (not in this case).
One thing that will be a big obstacle for me to overcome next year is discipline. Now, I will say in my defense that I did have a few exceptional situations that complicated my classroom management significantly, but there were plenty of situations where I needed to take better control of the situation – including kicking problem students out – and I just didn’t manage it.
SHE SEES HIM IN HER DREAMS...
-Have you noticed anything wrong?
* In an earlier published version of this post an elision of mine had Patrick McGuinness left off the longlist. Thanks to Dan Holloway for pointing out the error, which was mine and not John McAuliffe's, and apologies to John and the judging panel.
Bloomberg's opening remarks: economic growth
But to, borrow line from the TV network, April in the D, is an accurate evaluation time - and Inge showed no sign of providing the role he was needed for by the Tigers.
It is speculated that ANC stalwart Winnie Madikizela-Mandela and ANC national executive committee member Tony Yengeni will be the final witnesses to testify on Malema's defence.
I just LOVE the lowering of the turkey into his mouth...
Spaghetti Communism? The Politics of the Italian Western
Best Deals every day deals really are a great way to enjoy your own city without having breaking the financial institution. By wonder these queries, you can ensure that you take full advantage of the Discount Deals in support of have good experiences. Daily Offers center of operations collects best wishes from team buying web sites and types them to help you readily determine the Deals which interest a person.
Admission is $5 per child. Proceeds benefit Washington City Missions, non-denominational, Christian social services organization, which provides critically needed goods and services to homeless, poor and needy of Western Pennsylvania without regard to race, color, creed, national origin or religion. For more information, call (724) 222-8530.
my head was numb, the rest of me was on fire, and that's how I ended up with rare prime rib, and chocolate cake on my plate, your honor.........
In his death throes he would have seen his killers and then his children standing over him, screaming and crying.
Given the negative connotations about intelligence associated with low academic achievement, children have naturally assumed that boys are not as smart as girls. So begins the cycle of self-fulfilling prophecy: the belief that one is dumb, and so he will not perform his best.
Considering I stopped watching halfway through the season, I would rather see a different show in its place.
Barley Island: Dirty Helen Brown Ale moderate hop bitterness that has a unique slightly nutty flavor in the finish.
And, he sinks in the rear naked choke. Big submission win for Jake Bell. I would say a decision could have gone either way. Big victory for Jake Bell!
What a Mesh
During this afternoon’s talking stick session, most of my friends reported that unlike my mundane session, they had, indeed, experienced greatly enjoyable and strong visions during last night’s ceremony. Many had seen the wondrous visions I had hoped for and asked to see, but which I did not see. It was time to take stock of my vision experiences so far and see if I could make sense of it.
Rob Davis Mike Langlois
I previously mentioned that David Wilcock (affectionaly nicknamed “Wontdick” among the White Hats) had terminated his lover, Andrew Breitbart, but was unaware of doing it because his assassin alter was activated.
He can’t cope with love
Lili of the Valley - Astronaut: coloured with my Promarkers and Flexmarkers
And what happens when you say your concern isn’t for the truly poor, the lowest 2.5-5% of the nation, you’re called callous. Which is odd because he said we have a safety net for those people, which we do. We have public housing, and welfare, and Medicaid, food stamps (one thing that Newt is right about is that food stamp use has grown drastically under Obama), and a myriad of other federal, state and county programs. Not to mention the fact that we have free K-12 education for anyone under the age of 21. And as it is education that is the single greatest determining factor for personal success, it’s hard to say that we haven’t given the very poor the tools they need to not be very poor.
- Yeah, but… WHO WATCHES THE BOUNTY-HUNTERS?
Okay so I think it is safe to say that some of my blogs are gross. Or contain gross elements and I get to do alot of unusual things that other (or normal) people do not. To show everyone who may come across my blog that I too have normal interests like any other 23 year old girl, I thought I would write a post about my hobbies and interests.
I haven’t figured out how to get my Amazing Catechists feed working quite right, but one day I will. Meanwhile, I posted about Journals & the Sacrament of Confession this week. Because a real live human being (who I don’t know personally, and I have no idea when or where or how the incident took place) asked my opinion on this:
Nonetheless, I don't think I'll be there because (A) I just can't seem to save any money lately, so even $30 is probably out of my price range at the moment, especially given our recent vet bills, but the bigger issue is (B) with beers that strong, how in the hell am I going to get back home from Lakecreek? There's no buses out there (at least not on a Sunday evening), and I don't even like driving Hwy. 183 dead sober. Plus (patting myself on the back) I've lost five pounds in the past week – heck, I got pickled on a single pint of Lagunitas IPA last night.
Question: Do women act like asses when men shed their tops? You know, we might be as excited about that as you are, has that ever occurred to you? But we have learned to behave ourselves. I am utterly confident that men could learn the same, if expected to." -Women should have a right to be shirtless
When it comes to the pigmentation, Angel has the best of both worlds. Its pigmented but not too pigmented that you have to use a light hand when you apply it. I actually like that in a blush because that allows me to layer on the color without over doing it. Its better to apply a little at first and then go back and apply more if you feel like you need a little extra color on your cheeks.
That day, I learned the truth of what the Bible says so succinctly in Proverbs 12:18: "Reckless words pierce like a sword, but the tongue of the wise brings healing."
Now it is your turn to bring some love over to CMC and join us for come coloring fuN!
Complete chapter 2 of episode 1.
Ok, so...I vote for Lithuania. Their song was called "We Are the Winners (of Eurovision)".
To ensure that you are buying a genuine Wood 'n' Piece bangle, ring, pendant, earrings, necklaces, clocks, or tankard mugs please purchase through either our Etsy or MadeIt online stores or at Adelaide Stained Glass Studio on Brighton Rd Brighton in Adelaide. Or alternatively as a direct order placed with us through our official website: www.woodnpiece.com
I had planned to photograph my favourite cheese, if you really can have a favourite here. We have visited the town of Epoisse in the past, a very modest factory considering it produces one of the most famous French cheeses. In any case, unfortunately, I had to photograph just the box, as it was (I swear) quite impossible to stop eating the last third once I'd started. Anybody who knows this cheese will understand. And I have what is said to be the top Epoisse cheese in the frig, but don't dare open it in case I can't stop -Epoisses Berthaut - mind you, I do have about eight others to be going on with, so I shouldn't feel deprived.
In Acts 10:42, Peter says that Jesus was "appointed by God as Judge of the living and the dead." Again, this seems to be speaking of Jesus as crucified and raised. It's interesting that in Acts 2, Peter was preaching to the Jewish people, while in Acts 10, he is speaking to the ones who would become the first Gentile converts.
Yes only 6 minutes
Do you walk your dogs or does your dogs walk you? I know my dogs, Duke and Daisey walks me, they both are very strong and takes off with me trying to follow quickly behind them. Now that my girls are a little older, they are always wanting to help with everything and do everything mommy does, so taking the girls for a walk with the dogs was just plain impossible.
And then I woke up one day and you were gone.
Spiritual experiences are not isolated events but the result of an inner energy. The energy that sets the stream of inner experience in motion and sustains it is the Yoga Shakti or ‘power of Yoga’. Once that inner electricity is turned on, we will be able to access higher forms of perception, stronger forms of prana, deep feeling and direct knowing that are otherwise hard to reach for the ordinary human mind.
(By the way, if you're still looking for an "X" word, there's a list of unusual ones at the Phrontistery. I was tempted by xenogenesis until I remembered Octavia Butler already used it, and I am still interested in xanthocyanopsy.)
–Scenery–
Pots, pans and laundry were on one side
Excerpt: Greek voters enraged by economic hardship mauled traditional ruling parties in an election on Sunday, putting the country's future in the euro zone at risk and threatening to revive the region's debt crisis. The latest official results, with over 50percent of the vote counted, confirmed projections showing the only two major parties supporting an EU/IMF bailout that keeps Greece from bankruptcy would struggle to form a workable coalition.
The beer is, however, big. There was one exception: Breakside's Cranberry Biere de Table which is a very flavorful 3.3% ABV beer. After that, though, you are hard pressed to find a beer under 7% and there are many that hit the double digits. Yikes. There is also an abundance of Bourbon Barrel aged beers. I am not a huge fan of Bourbon beers as I often find the Bourbon overpowering and in conflict with the base flavors of the beer. But I am a minority as far as I can tell and for the Bourbon lovers, you are in luck.
They bring me a crazy amount of joy, make me laugh, keep me busy, and wear me out every day.
A little ol' list of things that have made me happy in the last couple of days:
Pro patria mori.
wildflowers growing along gravel roads
Here I am, sitting in the Pittsburgh airport and trying so hard not to think about the 17+ hours of travel ahead. And why would I put myself through this unimaginable hell? The answer, of course, is home. This is the eighth (or ninth…no eighth, I think) time I’ve done this flight in the last four years. Yes, it’s expensive. Yes, it’s uncomfortable. Yes, oral surgery is preferable. But I cannot resist the magnetism of the islands. They’re alive; they haunt my every breath; they possess my soul.
I was especially happy because the timing of my fight, and the access to internet meant that I could join the #BCSM (Breast Cancer Social Media) Twitter discussion for half an hour before I had to go to the departure gate. I particularly wanted to join this discussion too…………..
Clothes: I have my main outfit as well as backups and last minute alternates all packed and ready. A few things are in the dryer, but I have a big note out to remind me to grab them.
H – It’s just that I kind of think of you more in the Oliver Hardy role.
‘It is interesting to note that the quality of alertness in the nature of consciousness is due to the co-existence of these two opposite values within its structure. Togetherness of these contradictory qualities within the structure of consciousness renders consciousness wakeful, alert, and lively. Consciousness is the lively field of all possibilities.
Carter's bass lines come into the 'why didn't I think of that!?' category. They're not that complex in themselves, but they're so relentlessly creative - always shifting, always finding the perfect note, always outlining the harmony but in a way that follows an inexorable voice-leading logic. Carter bass lines are like voice-leading études - as perfect in this regard as any line from a Baroque composer. And they're always logical - hence the 'why didn't I think of that?' feeling you get as a bassist when you listen to Carter's lines. Of course the reason that you didn't think of that is because you (and by you I mean me!) are not as good as Ron Carter at this stuff! In fact in my opinion, nobody is as good as him at this voice-leading aspect of the music. Carter practices Bach a lot and you can hear this kind of contrapuntal intelligence in his lines.
Tape Measure Stamp
What would you like to simplify?
However, if you want to weed out the “one man/woman and his/her dog/cat” (choose your own cliche) operations and focus on those where the decision making power lies in the North West, you need companies which are headquartered here or have “a significant controlling head office presence”.
Is the frame on the left hand side not one of the most horrendous vomit inducing travesties of home decor? this is a before and after shot of a photo frame I transformed this weekend. This took a lot of coats of gesso, senca colour wash, hard rock candy crackle glaze and vintage photo frame distress inks.
The end result is surprisingly sophisticated! The cake is moist without being soggy and not too sweet. The almond aroma is distinct yet not overpowering.
MIDDLEBOROUGH (CBS) – Public swearing is so bad in Middleborough that they’re considering a plan to start enforcing a longstanding but rarely-used law.
This.
and diamonds piercing the mysterious black cape of night as they transform.
Kiah pulled out a new flash card, it was of a white crayon.
Jerry Garcia – lead guitar, vocals
Full results from Rieti can be found here. The weekend action will continue in full force tomorrow with the ISTAF meeting in Berlin. In the meantime enjoy Rudisha’s sterling run.
I've learned some things about Legos. If you like assembling things, you love them because they're so precise. But the play value doesn't end there. You can change them around, borrow from this piece and add to that one. You can supplement your "grownup" small-size Legos with the bigger Duplos you've been playing with since you were two. You can take apart your enormous Duplo zoo, perhaps leaving behind all the animals but reusing the building blocks and little people.
8. Read 8 books.
“To dare is to lose one’s footing momentarily. To not dare is to lose one’s self.” Søren Kierkegaard
As far as school goes, I'm up for another exciting semester filled with Chemistry and basic courses, along with a list of different ways I can drink in class (or at least in the library).
I’m curious too, I’m curious about your heart
And how pleased the "colleagues" all were, with David Jennings, a spokesman at Airbus Military, welcoming Britain into the fold, even though Germany was not to follow until over a year later. Brimming with confidence, Jennings happily announced that Airbus would launch the programme at the end of the year 2000 and begin deliveries in 2006.
The World According to Garp (Steve Tesich)
This and other “aha moments” led my husband and I to pull him out of every activity where he had to “sit” to learn. It was such a relief. He could have done it. He tries so hard to “be normal” and act like the other children when he is at preschool, but it exhausts him when he gets home. This was a hard calling to accept. It was one that I begged God not to make me do. Home school?!? This child… the one that I have been counting the years until he went to Kindergarten. But I couldn’t deny the overwhelming peace this decision brought, I guess God gives you that peace because His gifts and His call are irrevocable (Romans 11.29).
(Size S - Size M)
Favourite food of the week: Er, still Turkey BLT’s. I know, I’m boring. I am also in love with 12 Grain bread for my sandwich’s though. SO incredibly filling!
Disoriented as a fresh wave of distortion swept through his Gifted vision of the rock around him, Rel staggered, threw out a hand to steady himself against the wall. Long practice let him resist blinking, so he failed to miss the pattern in the illusion that looked like a curved sword-blade. When it scattered a spray of pebbles from the solid stone of the wall, Rel's blood went cold.
But I must add that she is assisted by a hand written note on the wall that literally has 911 written on it and circled. Why a morgue/funeral parlor run by one old man would need to have this written on the wall is beyond me. Unless he suffers from Alzheimer’s, in which case he probably shouldn’t be running a business working with people’s dead loved ones. This is where the real fun begins. As she’s on the phone with the police she walks away with the phone long enough that it rips the cord out. So she just keeps talking into the phone. She holds onto this broken phone for about 2 minutes until our killer comes in and kills the old man, who has enough on screen time to do nothing. Somehow she manages to get away (there must have been a sign on the door explaining how to use it) and runs out on the road. She unluckily gets picked up by the good guy, Kevin Gage who played the titular character in Demon Dave Defalco’s Chaos. Sad to say, but he’s about the only halfway decent actor in the movie. He asks her what happened to her, and no lie, she says “I came from the box; it was dark in the box”. So he takes her home, whereas he probably should have dropped her off at a police station or at least a library. His wife is mad at him for bringing her in, but caves into her really easily. I was seriously expecting this movie to go in the direction of porn during these scenes. It looks like it will, but then they just go to bed and sleep. Then, I guess an hour later because it’s night the whole movie, the killer has tracked her down (must be from the blood trail of the butchered English language) and kills the guys wife.
Hi Everyone! I want to thank everyone who hopped through our Bunny Hop this past weekend. We had SO much fun! For most of us, this was our first hop, and it was a HUGE success and confidence booster for us - we are so grateful for your kind comments & new followers!
But for most users it is more like this: Ask a question, Make a user account, write a bit more about your problem, contact with the “Expert” then you choose what you want to pay him for his services. Like $10, $20 or $30 dollars USD, and they claim you will get much faster and better help if you pay more. Anyways, the next step, you pay, you wait, you wait more and then you wait a little more. Then you check your bank account and you might see that they have “taken out more money” than you actually agreed to pay for a service you never even received.
I was working when this call came in. Our crews did an excellent job and were very professional about it all. Of course, inevitably, the news leaked out and it was all over Twitter, then Wikipedia, then the 'proper' news picked it up. Amy Winehouse was found dead and, apart from what I've written so far, that's as much as I can go into the subject.
The incident occurred on 29 December when an embassy driver was dispatched to the club to pick up three marines and one civilian staffer.
Inspired by Dj Satomi
Gorgeous, isn't it? Subtle, intuitive, full of light, life, and color. Guess what I paid for it. No, go on. Guess.
Despoil the children (and maybe yourself) for 2012. It is a project that pays both physical and emotional dividends for years to come and sets your kids on a path that I am positive you do want for them. Not one disadvantage could arise from taking on a despoiling project. (Well, they might not like it much, but that’s because they’re spoiled.) You will be happier, richer, have better relationships and a cleaner house if you stop spoiling the kids.
Steve Reddy of course went on to create Equal Vision Records. He and Dave Stein would put on the best hc shows ever back in the 80's. Albany was hit by everyone that was touring back then.
LSU holds the top spot, one point ahead of Alabama. Boise State and Oklahoma State tie for third, and Oklahoma rounds out the top five.
K-Y Brand Intense $5/1 - expires 2/28/2011
Grow stronger in your faith…..grow stronger in understanding how loving a God we came from…..and have SOMETHING to BELIEVE in…..wholeheartedly.
And despite the absence of the actual scripture verbiage many, if not most, people know exactly what is written in John 3:16.
5) Top it Off
Love is practical action, not romanticized idea. It is not conditional. It does not depend on whether I woke up on the right side of the bed today. It does not depend on whether another person is "worth" loving as I judge love, the person, the situation, all three.
One thing I’ve always wanted to do was watch a television show episode by episode and chronicle my thoughts and impressions as I go. It would probably work best if I did so with a current show that has just started so I can mull on my thoughts week to week while waiting for the next episode, but I don’t have a show that fits what I’m looking for that’s currently airing. Instead, I’m going to go through the process with a show that I’ve always heard was really good and is available in its entire run on Instant Netflix.
Hansel and Gretel: Witch Hunters also stars Famke Janssen and Peter Stormare, will be directed by Norwegian director Tommy Wirkola, and is due for release in Australia on the 1st March 2012. The UK and US will follow on the 2nd March.
Fungi… Oyster mushrooms can be found from spring to early winter, but watch out they are carnivorous. First the mushroom exudes a toxin that stuns nematode worms. Their thread-like mycelia then penetrate the worm and digest its internal organs.
1 and a half parts vodka
Nutmeg -
Sing come on along
The 5,600 interviews led to more than 1,100 confessions from suspects. Another 2,400 made statements about the crime. All of them may have had their Miranda rights watered down.
Today, Saturday, we drove down to Cinci from Sara’s place to the Flying Pig Expo.
So no, I don't have all the answers, and I never will. But here are some things I do know, and a few things I've figured out along the way:
Wow, is what I have to say about what happened today. I'm going to share another very personal experience, because this is my life and it's who I am. I'm an open book with nothing to hide and this is important to me.
Are you getting a break over Christmas too or working through?
Rachel Martin has been working for the FBI as a psychic consultant for years now, but psychics get no respect in the police department and Rachel hears the whispers behind her back. At work and at home she tries to play down her psychic abilities, telling everyone that she's a crime scene expert and that she's simply good a puzzles. But she can't get rid of her reputation - the 'loony lady'.
Her dreams haven’t materialized as she had imagined, but Brenda has found that God has a much bigger plan for her. Conversational and candid, One Call Away invites readers facing their own difficulties to trust God and discover hope in the future.
This is an Italian cake that looks so appetising I was sold the minute I set my eyes on it!
I am not the only one who likes a guess; Jackie of Farmlanebooks, Nomadreader, Open Letters and Her Royal Orangeness have had a crack too, plus Jessica (who has become one of my new favourite bloggers, she makes me howl) has done her top five. I will report back with the list of books and my thoughts when it’s been announced. Until then, what books would you like to see (not necessarily the same as the books you think will) end up on the Orange Prize Longlist when it gets announced?
Anything big you've walked away from and regretted? And am I certifiably insane for leaving that pendant behind?
Just look at those gorgeous, creamy layers. And a chocolate topping sure doesn't hurt.
The Great Barrow and Helegrod both have gating mechanisms (you must complete the first instances before you have access to the final instance), but Garth Agarwen does not use the same approach. Fornost already has a gate key which could possibly be transitioned into the new gating mechanism. In the original instance, this was a one-person drop and I’m sure not many people ran the instance just to get the key, so many people might get left out and have to run the instance but I suspect it won’t be as big of a chore.
Robyn's Fetish Digital Stamps and More are sponsoring challenges 29 and 30 and are giving one lucky winner 5 digital stamps or 4 digital stamps and 1 digital paper set of their choice.
Cheer Up Farm
Jeffrey Giordano, 46, New York, N.Y.
Finishing work on a Friday night and driving down the country lanes with the moon shining above. (Then cracking open a bottle of rum...yum!)
3. How many countries have you visited?
Helen Pidd, the reporter who is covering the trial, was concerned beforehand that reducing "his justifications to a stream of 140-character soundbites" would be giving Breivik the platform he sought.Pidd fingers the most important reason: Despite the reduction and distortion, she finds her enemy's position still too potent.Pidd said: "I would say I have had far more comments from people thanking me for the 'grim but necessary' reports on Twitter than those complaining I was giving Breivik the platform he craved. Two followers tweeted me to say they were 'unfollowing' until I left Oslo because it was 'too much'."
joy on the rides..
Mind you, it was also written a month before Ming Campbell became Lib Dem leader, and he didn't get even a mention.
Will: Newt Gingrich wants to be another
CBS – This is the strongest of the networks, so few things are on the bubble. Incidentally CBS has very few shows that I watch or remotely care about. So despite having a few shows that may or may not return, I could care less. Thus ends my CBS segment.
Today I thought I would share with you the little things in my life that make me happy :)
These are all separate shapes I made using everyday kitchen stuff. The bottom portion was made using a cylindrical plastic holder I had. To cover each piece, I first crumb coated it in butter cream frosting, rolled out my white fondant and carefully covered each piece. Since it is supposed to have a grainy, stone look, I didn't smooth it out a great deal.
